I Remember today to live life fully and completely. For this day will never again be repeated. What and how I use this very day is my choice and I choose to make it my best day ever!!! When tomorrow comes I will look back and remember just how glorious the day was and smile.
Correspondingly, if you talk about ideas that may or may not have merit, but still evoke the same kinds of emotion, you get in even bigger trouble. Such is the position that Larry Summers found himself in a couple years ago. He spoke about the reasons that women are underrepresented relative to the population-at-large in tenure-track faculty positions in the sciences. Famously, one reason he gave was the possibility that there are "innate differences" between men and women. He explicitly said what he meant by this: even if the mean aptitude of men and women were the same, if the variance in the male population is greater than the variance in the female population then there will be more men at the extremes (both high and low). Since faculty are drawn exclusively from one extreme, men would be overrepresented.
Each character is flawed and deeply developed through the four seasons; they model how to push through problems and meet one another with tough love. No one is spared humiliation or failure. There are wise souls in the hamlet, and there are fools. Likewise, you will find the same mix in Candleford, as in all places. When the hamlet and town folk meet, class distinctions and prejudice surface. Society’s rules get challenged. Neighbors help neighbors at home, and between town and hamlet; they hurt them too. They live Rumi’s advice: “Be generous and grateful. Confess when you’re not" (from his poem "The Well"). And then like the old Jerome Kern song says, they pick themselves up, dust themselves off, and start all over again.
raised the numbers of the endangered species, the woodland caribou in the Albertan Rocky Mountains. Some caribou will be returned to their natural habitat starting this year. (Sorry, we don’t have any personal photos.)
I was wrong.
Use immediately, or cover and refrigerate for up to 3 days. Perfect on sandwiches or as an appetizer with crostini or vegetables. Makes about 1-1/4 cups. (Recipe adapted from 400 Best Sandwich Recipes Cookbook, by Alison Lewis)
Rescue those being led away to death; hold back those staggering toward slaughter. Proverbs 24:11
3/4 lbs mushrooms, chopped (we used shitake and oyster)
Juli loves to get her hands dirty growing her own food. Last year she rented plots at a community garden. Growing food and companionship, all at the same time!
She’s easy to buy for, pictures of her family are her love… she is everything that anyone could want in a mom. Devoting all her life to her family. We are blessed indeed.
I believe success should not be determined by the speed with which we move. Eating more doesn’t make the dish more delicious. Getting angry over traffic doesn’t make it move faster. How about learning to stay calm, enjoy life and make use of it in a more meaningful way? By simplifying our life and getting rid of the speediness, we can focus more on human relations and start to appreciate the meaning of life. Calmness and deliberation are also the key aspects to decision-makings. By carefully identifying and weighing alternatives, we are more inclined to make better decisions in business and in our own life.
WHY??
As usual when I can't tell you much about the band I'll pad it out with other snippets; such as; it was probably recorded at the Fairview Studios in Hull as the recording engineer was Roy Neave & it was produced by Nigel Ward
Coworker 1: Well, that’s his nickname.
Polemic fiction has a long and honored -- and sometimes dishonored (Atlas Shrugged by wackjob Ayn Rand comes to mind) -- history in the literary world. In the long run it's very hard to pull off with any finesse. And that is why I was pleasantly surprised with this book. The author has a definite point of view and he's not afraid of making it known, but not at the expense of story and character.
Think I need another lazy reading Sunday to get through book 2.
First, many Americans are brought to Mormonism by its large volunteer missionary effort. Then there's the combination of a reasonably high LDS birthrate and reasonably high retention of those born in the faith.
Ruthie's grandmother is in the hospital and suffering on account of hospital food. Ruthie to the rescue!
“Oh, Jesus …”
Tom lives in Western Minnesota about 4 hours from La Crosse. We’ve kept in touch though Facebook and media, with Tom always expressing an interest to come and chum around the La Crosse area with me. This past year at the AGLOW convention in Iowa I ran back into Tom; and after seeing my pictures of the area and hear me talk to other AGLOW members about the Coulee Region, his desire to come here grew.
Check back soon for more tips on how to make social media work for your business.
VIDEO QUALITY: B-
THE PALE KINGSecond on my list would be “The Pale King,” a book that chronicles mainly about American tax-collection body Internal Revenue Service (IRS), but also dullness and boredom in our mundane life.
Knowing how often I get caught up in my own reactive states, reading this got me to, well, thinking. What does it mean to think rather than simply react? For me, this rather simple yet challenging question translates into my own personal “wake up call.”
Beat the butter on medium speed for one minute. Add the granulated sugar and beat for three minutes. It will be very light and fluffy. Scrape down the bowl, add the brown sugar, and beat for two more minutes. Add the eggs, one at a time, beating for one minute after each. Mix in the vanilla. Add the flour alternately with the sour cream. Scrape down the bowl once more, and give it a final few seconds to fully combine.
every single action could bring that storm
The reason for the polygraph test invitation was that Makhanya made comments after my firing that were simply not true. He invented a meeting I had with him in his imagination and told journalists eager for a bit of juicy gossip that I told him I believed what I had written in the column and that I thought blacks were “indolent savages”. That never happened as Makhanya knows but all he needs to do if he thinks I am wrong and he is right is to take up my invitation of a polygraph test. It may not be admissible evidence in court but it would be interesting to see the result. I don't have any problem with it so why does he?
Consumer’s emotions are affected by their environment, and they evaluate their environment with their emotions. It makes sense strategically to understand what creates and sustains pleasant emotional reactions.
Lots of crafty hugs
This ‘digital short’ consists of (at least, according to Brian of the washing machine post) the final chapters that never made it into How I Won The Yellow Jumper. If you’ve read Yellow Jumper, then the style is familiar, and so is the general approach: events from the race are woven together with sideways observations on the mundane, behind-the-scenes life of the Tour. The text is punctuated with pictures, as in Yellow Jumper: happily, you can actually see them clearly this time, thanks to the ebook format.
On my first day I was shown into the room of the then Principal Administrative Officer of the Town Clerk’s Department in which I was to forge my career. (The Town Clerk's Department was the legal department and serviced the political machine ie the elected council.) I can recall his words as if they had been uttered yesterday. “You have joined The Town Clerk’s Department of Liverpool Corporation. The Department will train you. You will be sent to University. You will receive promotions as befit your ability and application to the job. You will have a job for life. In return you have to remember one thing and one thing only. Your job is the same as the job of every one of the thirty thousand employees in the Corporation. Your job is to serve the public. Remember that above all else." And he meant it. Whatever else most people I worked with thought about their job most truly believed that they were serving the best interests of the public of Liverpool.
I'm on the lookout for a few mirrored trays for our bedroom as well as a few whimsical trays for the kitchen/ dining room. Luckily there are a variety of options at quite a few price points. Here are my picks for trays under $40:
I'm not the kind of person that makes resolutions. I know I need to loose a few pounds and exercise and all that, but hey, isn't that what everyone starts the new year off with? Instead, I'm going to try and be in the moment more with my family. I need have some more alone time with Bry, and most importantly I need to make some time for myself.
But it’s been a bit chilly this week. In fact, we’re all starting to get grumped out about it, so I’d like to thank the person who took the time to clothe the naked figures of this statue. You made me very happy when I arrived at work this morning, welcomed by this sight: the statues had acquired hats and scarves.
Companies who adopt this new marketing paradigm are not only generally more profitable, but they subscribe to a triple bottom line objective of profit, people and planet as opposed to a pure profit maximization strategy that typically only serves to benefit shareholders.
At that moment the veluptuous vixen attempted to open her car's door only to find out that she had locked her keys in her car.
So, this was really just to check in and assure you all that I’m still kickin’. I’m headed to the zoo tomorrow, and on Friday, I’m headed to Michigan, so it’s shaping up to be a really long week. I promise I’ll get better about blogging; during break, you’d think it’d be easier to blog, but in reality, I don’t have much to talk about (that wouldn’t bore the pants off of you, anyways).
The Charm Of Home
He said Sunday that after the blast, he received text messages to halt evangelical work or face harsh punishment. Ayyad says he does not preach his faith.
One day, an evil sorcerer disguised himself as a poor boy. He told the girl that his mother was sick, and he didn’t know what to do. The girl said “I’ll get you a fruit and you can use its power to heal your mother.” The girl climbed the tree, got one fruit, went back down, and gave it to the boy. In an instant, the boy changed into an evil sorcerer. “Hahahaha,” he said, his evil laugh resonating throughout the woods, “I have tricked you. Now I will become the most powerful sorcerer on earth!” He took a bite from the fruit, and he turned into a really good boy.
Next, just spray two coats of chalkboard paint and let dry 24 hours. That's it!
Episode one consists of seven chapters. Looking through the trophy list, it’s apparent the other four episodes have seven chapters too. It might not sound like much but if episode one is anything to go by, each episode will last roughly two hours. That depends of course on whether or not you’re deciding to go through each episode more than once.
There is a way out for Haryana with the current success stories where they can revive their lost image and get rid of the chauvinistic tag associated with the men of Haryana , now whether they do this is certainly upon them since the rest of the India will be watching.
Total destruction of the economy
~Adrienne Rich
and another batch of dresses from the very generous Pat who also very kindly photographs her dresses for me and emails me when they are on their way. You will see why this is so helpful when you read below...
“Number 3,” said the BM, stifling a yawn.
Lee Chung-Yong: After what must have been an aggravating season for Chung-Yong as he has had to sit out after a pre-season injury at Newport County.
I of course took no pleasure in this, simply smiling at the fact that I was now teaching my brother a few things about the world.
Bourdieu, Pierre (1993) The Field of cultural production Cambridge: Polity Press
The Tale of the Fortunate Rope-Maker
Of course, there's nothing wrong whatsoever with reading purely for entertainment. But it's interesting that Isobel Akenhead says that sales of 'women's fiction' have dropped off generally. Are we simply talking comparative numbers in a market that is nevertheless a major source of income for publishers, or can Eco be right about people wanting other kinds of literature, too?
lots & lots of coffee
Anwaar: Really, o great one? Tell that to me straight in the eye. You can’t, can you?
Our policy in Central and South America under this administration has been abysmal. The way we have treated, in particular, countries like Honduras, Honduras, which stood up for the rule of law, which threw out a would-be dictator who was using the Chavez playbook from Venezuela in order to try to run for re-election in Honduras, and the United States government, instead of standing behind the — the people in the parliament, the people in the Supreme Court, who tried to enforce the constitution of Honduras — instead of siding with them, the Democrats, President Obama sided with two other people in South America — excuse me — Central America and South America. Chavez and Castro and Obama sided against the people of Honduras.
I am a simple woman with an open mind. If you are as kind as to be interested in what makes me tick, I encourage you to read this-here blog...maybe comment. It's always lovely to see the impact my creation has on others. Other than that, enjoy yourself, for you are always welcome here. I am grateful for your presence. All my love guys,
Rufus Quickblade hadn’t returned from warning the king.
Yes, if you have the self-belief in our book to do the best job possible on it and to put it out there. You have to be willing to put up with the possible bad reviews and initial lack of sales but the good reviews will keep you going (as I am finding on Changers’ Summer as the reviews from review copies have started to hit Amazon.com).
But for today, for this weekend, transitory happiness was found in these yellow split peas.
It was this general state of fear and loathing that led me to regard my own children's adolescence with apprehension—even before they had been conceived. MJ recently uncovered a piece of paper that apparently dates back to the early years of my relationship with Frank. On it, I had listed the pros and cons of having kids, and the teenager thing made the Cons list (one of the few cons I, as a rabid kid-lover, had been able to come up with). Needless to say, we carried on with the baby-making even with the dreaded horrors of puberty looming ahead. MJ arrived in all her glory and I was thrilled.
So we have memories of kohl rabi, prepared and dressed up as many ways possible that our poor frazzled mother could think of –Asian-style: kohl rabi stir-fried and braised with slices of beef , chicken or pork with abit of soy sauce or kohl rabi in a meat based soup stock with rice or noodles on the side. Ok, maybe there weren’t that many dish variations after all.
A school is charged with attempting to "educate" hundreds of students to essentially the same level of competence in numerous arcane subjects. To do so while attempting to ensure that children "learn" is a near impossibility, unless the system is set up with rigid controls to cycle through the most people possible - which means that the entire system is set up to deliver to the least common denominator with the least amount of disruption. To combat this and reach maximum efficiency, a school district will resort to virtually any means possible to ensure that students sit still, pay attention, and "learn." Take this recent situation, for example; several states have banned the wearing of Silly Bandz Bracelets in their schools, because of the "distraction" it presents, which limits learning:
Stinging nettle is also loaded with vitamins and minerals. You just pick off the tops anytime before they get more than a foot tall. We have lots of them growing here. Make sure you were gloves though. Once the nettle is cooked it loses it sting. This I just boil in salt water and use like spinach in quiches or whatever hot dish I make. If I am making soup I just add it in fresh if I have it fresh. I also save the water that I boil it in and use it in tea.
Having re-read this grilling of Cameron by Sopel – irrespective of the fact that i am supposed to be ‘socialist’… Cameron worries me. Nothing seems to be structured, coherent, thought out. This is not really good enough for a prospective prime minister who has had some years to work things out. Waffle just doesn’t cut it in tutorials with first year students… it certainly doesn’t when it comes to policy statements from a man who puts himself forward as the next prime minister. Kenneth Clarke? too late for a Conservative leadership challenge?
Well, Honey has a ton of antibacterial and healing properties that is great for acne and sensitive skin. It also helps your skin get back its natural pH and acidity.Many people have been using Honey for wounds and burns and they just apply it to the skin and leave it on the wound for several hours. To use Honey as a wash, I simply take a teaspoon of honey and rub it all over my face. I pay special attention to my trouble areas and then I let it sit for a minute and the I rinse with warm water. Make sure to use raw or natural honey...and not honey flavored syrup!!! If you are looking for some extra exfoliation try baking soda or brown sugar to the mix. I usually add about a half of a teaspoon. It is so delightful and I still can not believe how well it works!!!
All I know is that he polished off his glass long before I did. This was a sipper for me. Good, smooth, with the alcohol burn becoming less apparent with each gulp, but still a sipper. I couldn't really imagine having too much of this, but one pint was perfect. I had to get up early in the morning for the first time in almost 2 weeks. Blerg.
Korean BBQ meat
Great people don’t always start out so great. In fact, some of the best people in the world come from broken homes, tarnished beginnings.
Star Trek
This spills over into my job as a teacher. Since I teach PE for grades K-8, my weekly lesson plan looks like a spread sheet, with equipment and activities carefully planned so I have time to transition between say, an eighth grade class and kindergarten.
1/4 tsp. baking powder
Danny turned and watched her all the way, and caught her looking over her shoulder. A real proper fond look on her face. He wiped the sweat from his forehead and pushed it back through his hair, feeling the coils of blond hair lick round his fingers.
It sounds radical, but in terms of knowledge and learning, I don’t think it is really incredibly radical to say that schools are not as necessary as they used to be- but then the way that they are necessary will continue to be valid until society changes dramatically in other, economic, ways.People need their kids to be in school because they are working.So it’s hard to imagine a world without school before imagining a world in which jobs have been dramatically restructured.
of what we call
This is what I'm upcycling next...love it love it LOVE it!! I know some folks would be so dismayed about painting a 100 year old wee piece like this...but I'm not (lol). Going away to a cottage on the ocean in Prince Edward Island for two weeks with my grandkidlets on Sunday, and this will be my homecoming project. I paid a little more for it than I would have if I was planning to re-sell, but I sure am NOT. This little beauty (and the matching stool) will have a permanent place in my home, in the livingroom, looking out over my perennial gardens. Aaahhh...life is...GOOD!!
Thank you http://thislittlelight516.wordpress.com/ for this nomination. I’m very pleased. 27th February will be two months since I started blogging.
The two men disentangled themselves and fought their way up to standing. In front of them, the darkness was filled with faint glimmers where torchlight reflected from immaculate plastic and metal. The vague shape of the room was visible, enough to make out that it matched the door for size, but the space inside was so tangled with racks and walkways that making sense of it became impossible.
19.FUGAZI "The Word"
This church cannot seek truth without money.
“Nine sounds better.”
This session will focus on changes to Medicare that affect all Medicare beneficiaries, including:
On Sunday we went to do some tea shopping in Comercial Mexicana. We found tea, and we found something else as well. I had never paid attention to the store’s bakery. Always ran through it. This time, however, I noticed something. Loaves of dark-coloured baked goods, placed with indulgent carelessness into wicker baskets, presenting their good side to the world.
And as I run and as I change, I think of who I’ve loved and I think of who has made this path easier to navigate. I run faster from the woods and oak trees, faster from the soundtrack as it begins to echo behind me.
JACKPOT ! BUT HOW MUCH DO WE WIN ?
2011-11-24 22:26
18. Humble
An internal investigation is also underway.
Throughout viewing Golia's exhibition, I kept thinking of all the reasons that I was disappointed, of the fine line between expectations and the financial and physical ability (according to conditions) of an artist to live up to their dreams. I thought perhaps it was a Gagosian problem. Golia had the smallest gallery in the house and was limited in what he could do. Perhaps it was a money problem. Perhaps it was a Golia problem, perhaps the myth outgrows the man at the moment. It is difficult to know.
We are keeping our birthday blog hop open for one more week!
My new book The four letters of love is already out on Amazon in paperback.
"Oh thanks Hun." I felt the cup on the nightstand beside me. There wasn't a trace of warmth in it. "Sorry Babe, it's even too cold for me, but the thought was lovely. And I appreciate you not waking me up..."
As part of the University of Ottawa’s History and Theory of Art program, a group of fourth-year students is publishing Millefeuilles, a journal of research papers by this year’s graduates. An accompanying symposium will be held at the University of Ottawa on May 12.
Disney, Winnie the Pooh, Sesame Street, Pixar, & other such characters we all LOVE.
ME: (as I backed away slowly) Thank you very much.
People are happy eating BullShit Sushi anyway.
Mati, the Tygrine Cat, exploded on to the children's book scene a few years ago, whiskers twitching, tail lashing, golden eyes aflame. And now he's back, in Inbali Iserlis' sequel The Tygrine Cat on the Run (Walker Books). I must admit a prejudice favour of this magnificent animal and his stories: Mati is an Abyssinian and I've had two of those. Sadly both my handsome boys had short lives but I can still appreciate such a fine figure of a cat.
Thanks for stopping by! That's it for me for today. See you tomorrow for another fun Mo's DP2 Challenge!
Every time I was asked about a sequel, I thought, should I? Could I?
(c) 2012 by True Liberal Nexus. All rights reserved.
The Greek result was no more of a surprise than the French one but is is a wilder card event. At the moment, it looks as though a coalition can be formed, but how long a new government could survive isn’t clear. The Greek people have spoken, but only to say they are disillusioned and angry. My bet for today is that the US, having sold risk off after payrolls that were soft but not soft to change anything, will bounce. If that happens, we will have an edgy day in which ranges hold. The catalyst for a decisive move lower by the euro remains absent, though the move is inevitable eventually.
Cholesterol - 256
BG: There are a couple of obvious things, I suppose. Most of the stories in Walking the Labyrinth were set in the south Wales valleys, and many of them explored issues around Welsh identity and culture. Only a few of the stories in Blindfold have valleys settings – though some of them are set in Cardiff – and there’s less of an attempt to explore those issues specific to post-industrial south Wales, for want of a better phrase. Many of the stories in this new collection are set elsewhere, or often have non-specific, sometimes vaguely surreal, settings. I’m really not sure why that should be the case, to be honest. Perhaps I felt I’d worked through some of those specific cultural issues in the previous collection, though it certainly wasn’t a conscious decision.
So what are the alternatives to direct questioning?
Her twin tulips, tipped crimson
Do I think of myself as smart? Do I think of myself as beautiful?
At dusk the rain started. Tropical torrents accompanied by sky shattering thunder claps. Conversation grew hushed. We wrapped the children in spare towels to keep them warm and tried to move them out of the worst of the weather. With the wind gusting our candles sizzled out and our only light was an eerie pirouetting beam from a torch dangling from the roof of our shelter. As the light danced around picking faces out of the gloom I felt encouraged - here was a bunch of people from many countries who didn't know each other. We were cold, we were wet, we didn't know what was coming, but we were smiling and helping each other. I'm sure the tentions would have arisen had we been there for days rather than hours - but as a stranger gave a yogurt to a tired child or offered the use of a phone to a family there was an element of Blitz Spirit to be proud of.
OPTION 1: Breakdown/Separation of Fellowship
Do we understand what Christ did for us? Philippians 2:8 (NASB) “Being found in appearance as a man, He humbled Himself by becoming obedient to the point of death, even death on a cross.” When that verse speaks of Jesus humbling Himself it means that He did not have to leave His position of glory that He held in Heaven with the Father. But he came down as a simple man, a carpenter, and walked this earth in poverty and strife. He allowed others to abuse Him and mock Him. He was sentenced to die without even a real charge against Him that was true. Yet He did not fight back. He could have. In the account of His arrest in Matthew He stated that if He wanted He could summon up more than twelve legions of angels to fight for Him. But He sacrificed His own glory, His reputation, and was “obedient” to the point of death.
I just recently had my first couscous salad and, oh it was amazing. Couscous are small particles of semolina, like a tiny pasta. I've never been keen to try it since it seemed like something that would be bland, flavourless, uninteresting.... But when it's made with chicken broth and cheese, it can be so good.
The way you sneak cookies and then tell me "Don't wuh-wy Mom. I'm doin' nuffin."
7. Dogs
We might even go and get a new toy for me at PetSupermarket!
Gameplay is easy to learn as you can opt to have in-game hints, or step up to the challenge with minimal aid. Combat is stress-inducing as weapons are obviously scarce, requiring Alan Wake-like concocting on the fly. Strategy comes into play as you rid of walker scum with caution not to turn a stealthy kill of one into a manic killing of a swarm. But make sure you are quick with your button pushing. A sluggish reaction to the real-time button input, and you’re zombie meat. I was a bit too slow in one of my game-changing decisions (each choice you make, whether in combat or conversation, alters the episode) and the whole fleet succumbed. It definitely keeps you on your toes.
Either way, I don't think anyone will be leaving before the fair. I think Baerli, Kit Kat and the new doelings will be going to the fair again this year so I have some time to watch them grow and see how they do. I did warn Husband that disposition goes far in my book. I don't care how great a doe may be - if she's not easy to handle she's gonna go.
.....I seriously dig the chapter titles of Percy Jackson and the Olympians. I mean, really- "Three Old Ladies Knit The Socks Of Death."
Why I loved it: Amazing writing and brilliant story. Well written and addictive: loved it until the very end and lingered in my head long afterwards.
he set my staggering heart aflame
It's colder, and even harder to parse in all its suggestive details, but also, as that early refrain indicates, more frankly adult.
Have I adapted? Oh yes, I have adapted. It’s the sixth anniversary for Scotland and I’m starting to enjoy the rage.
Very much.
The 'father' figure is one of strength and discipline, never forget that bit of tenderness, so needed in all our lives.
Girl: "Oh, Dallas is only 30 minutes behind New Orleans? Wow, I thought it would be more."
It wasn’t the best of days. I found myself a little more fragile and high-strung than I had set out to be. It seemed like everywhere I went today there was a new baby unwittingly flaunted in front of me. The disgruntled newborn in Target this evening nearly sent me over the edge. It was that distinct cry of an infant… only days, maybe weeks old. The tears involuntarily welled up in my eyes as I quickened my pace away from the sound and frantically tried to remember what I had even come there for. The new layout of the store wasn’t making things any easier on me as I accidentally wound up in a maze of bottles and receiving blankets… cute little pink booties and baby rattles sneered at me. Is this how it’s going to be? Am I just a time bomb ready to detonate at any given second?
What are we if we don’t strive to be like God above?
One of my goals for this month is to transform my craft room into a functional and attractive space that I enjoy spending time in. It's currently mostly a dumping ground for my crafting supplies. This means that there are no usable work surfaces, that it's hard to find something when I need it, and that it's not a space I enjoy using. This is what it looked like after the holiday craziness.
One of the more interesting, unusual and unheralded programs to deal with this problem began in the spring of 1977. As detailed in a New York Times article dated April 7, 1977 by Judy Klemesrud, Cardinal Terence Cooke, speaking to parents at Holy Cross School on 8th Avenue and 43rd Street denounced the spread of pornography and called on all Catholics to demonstrate publicly against pornography in Hell’s Kitchen and to picket some of the more notorious pornographic establishments. This in many ways was an amazing and unprecedented request. While there may have been demonstrations against pornography in places like Tipton Iowa, or perhaps even conservative areas of Queens, public anti-pornography demonstrations a block from Times Square by residents of Hell’s Kitchen were unheard of. Times Square going back to the days of the Tenderloin was always a risqué area. Furthermore, given the brazen nature of many of these prostitutes and their pimps there was potentially a fair amount of physical danger to anti-pornography demonstrators confronting them on the streets. In addition, it was widely believed that the mafia (actually the Colombo crime family) was a partner in many of the porno establishments, and it was unclear what they might do against demonstrations that directly affected their economic interests. Also public demonstrations were more commonly tactics of anti-war groups, not the Catholic Church or Tammany Hall political clubs (although the idea may have come from the tactics of such groups).
The Characters:
It’s just as well that Obama is secure enough in his sexuality not to blast the poster to kingdom come with a Cruise missile. He’s recently been proving his heterosexual credentials by canoodling with Julia Gillard, the raunchy redhead who rules the roost in Australia. After greeting Ms Gillard with a moist-looking peck on the cheek, he patted her receptive tush right into the White House. I hope Michelle was mature enough not to give him hell afterwards – there’s no such thing as cheating when you’re making political alliances.
I'm over-the-moon-excited to go to the Women of Faith conference this weekend!
4) Research the little people. Did you ever think to sit down and find information on all the people involved in Star Wars, whom you had no idea about? Do you have any idea how many people work with/for Lucasfilm? From video games, to books, to comics, to marketing and ‘fan outreach’. Star Wars is more than just George Lucas – it’s George Lucas and his peeps!
I painted two tables in this color.
The Year 2009 will be remembered as a notoriously historic year. What a wild ride the economy took us all on! In spite of the Recession, things were jumping here at the tent. In fact, we took the Economic Challenge as an opportunity to try out a couple of new ideas – Brunch, Latin Dance Nights, MirrorTent Music, and many more!
I am pinching myself. This year has flown by.
of experiences of his presence after
Take care and I'll see y'all back here soon!
Were the instructions easy to follow?
He also spends a bit of time attacking the tired notion that when rich people get richer they create jobs:
I didn't change anything except for the amount of egg white and the bitters. I went back to the original amount for the egg white and found that such a small amount is exactly what this cocktail needs. While it wasn't as pretty as the last--the color was not as rich and no real foam appeared--it did not separate. The smell and taste were very similar to that above. I did replace the orange bitters with aromatic on the fly, which was a welcome addition. The spiciness came through on the aftertaste and really brought the idea of the Manhattan to the forefront. The texture was still creamy and smooth, though less so, as expected. All in all, a worthwhile experiment, with a very tasty cocktail at experiment's end. Now I feel like Mr. Baker's words will work: "This is another one to watch cannily lest our pedal extremities fold up at some totally inappropriate moment." Indeed!
The Essential Bible Companion / John H. Walton, Make L. Strauss and Ted Cooper Jr.
‘The cabin crew made things worse. They were all really panicked. We weren’t told anything other than we had to go back to Gatwick and make an emergency landing.
And you know what this realization causes inside of me?
Is a HUG so bad!…(smiling)…If you have this awesome person hugging you for whatever the reason then what could be better? People tell me that it is a female thing-ok I am a female! And with a nice mans arms wrapped arround me will you still say “oh its a female thing”? After all if I was not a REDHEADED female who has your attention and obviously you would be someone who has mine-why would we not be hugging? So just HUG me and don’t talk…..
So while the game may not be quite as good as its predecessor and definitely falls in the “more of the same” category, Naughty Dog still manages to deliver an excellent action-adventure game. With great characters and story, epic set piece moments, jaw-dropping graphics and robust multi-player options this is one game that any PS3 owner shouldn’t hesitate to check out.
Watch these videos to see what the themes of the months are and what the angels wish to communicate to you. These messages are for everyone! Natalia Kuna is Angel Intuitive, certified by Doreen Virtue. She gives psychic / intuitive angel card messages.
“Helping already.”
Yellow split moong dal - 1 cup
(click to see images full size)
...You became sasssssy...
Gregory: Debbie the debates don’t make
And hedge row crickets notes that run
I have been hoping and hoping that Babby would turn into a thumb sucker, but it just doesn’t seem to be happening. So I am still his nighttime soother and this results in him needing to nurse every time he wakes up. I know perfectly well that he’s not actually hungry, but he screams like a banshee without it. The author explains that Babby’s sleep association with booba is so strong that he thinks he NEEDS it to go back to sleep, which is a problem because people naturally wake up every couple of hours. Most of us just roll over and go back to sleep, but if you think you need a booba in order to sleep, you might get upset. She has some tips on how to wean him off of booba, namely popping the booba out of his mouth as soon as he starts to fall asleep, so the association at least doesn’t get any stronger.
Here’s the original cut fyi (password is zenith, really difficult I know, ive just hidden it until the directors cut premières)
FIVE BLOGS THAT ARE ‘LIEBSTER’ TO ME…
I wish I could find the words to write about how I feel. Writing has always been my outlet, my way of sorting out my thoughts and figuring out my feelings. But it's just not working this time. Something's different. I feel lost, and I can't seem to find my way back. I hate this.
The greater Chittagong area including Cox’s Bazar was under the rule of Arakan Kings from the early 9th century till its conquest by the Mughals in 1666 AD. When the Mughal Prince Shah Shuja was passing through the hilly terrain of the present day Cox’s Bazar on his way to Arakan, he was attracted to the scenic and captivating beauty of the place. He commanded his forces to camp there. His retinue of one thousand palanquins stopped there for some time. A place named Dulahazara, meaning “one thousand palanquins”, still exists in the area. After the Mughals, the place came under the control of the Tipras and the Arakanese, followed by the Portuguese and then the British.
Not everyone is for everyone. I was reminded of this recently when I reached out to a friend of a friend for the second time and was—I now understand—rejected.
A clasp of hands before Kamal returns to his path
By far the biggest of these, for my money, is France. Having failed to get a shovel into either the EFSF or the ECB, and having watched as the world showed zero interest in the leveraging bazooka, all they’ve done over the last three weeks is sink deeper into the doo-doo. I remain of the view – first expressed here following the EFSF rows leading up to the GdF – that if the Gallic banking fall-over can be contained, this suits Berlin perfectly. France can bail out its banks and remain afloat, but it’ll have taken one mother of a torpedo amidships. This will relegate Sarkozy’s country to the second rank, and force her to do Germany’s bidding. But if the ship sinks, then Germany’s plans are, basically, ruined. So my prediction is that, when push comes to shove, Berlin will keep Paris afloat. What it won’t do is buy the French a new engine. (I think the rumours about a north-south Europe divide reflect another of the options being held in reserve, just in case the Sorbonniers throw all their toys out of the pram.)
Similarly the squares at the bottom of the fold line are folded by folding them in different direction as shown.
Publisher: Hyperion Books
No worries!
Breakfast was another heavy affair – I keep on talking about ‘feasting’ because at Mountain Trail, they fed us really well. Every meal exceeded our expectations. The variety, quantity, and quality of food was value for money – it didn’t seem that pricey either.
Sure, I will freely admit that I think it's good for our national consciousness to have this terrorist eliminated. We've been dragging around this heavy weight for the last ten years; pushing the search for Bin Laden to the back of our minds, and trying the forget that he was the reason we removed the Taliban, bombed and killed hundreds, if not thousands, of civilians in Afghanistan, and somehow tried to legitimize our attack and occupation of Iraq because of either the ties to Bin Laden and Al Qaeda, or because we were worried that Saddam Hussein was going to become another terrorist (I could never exactly figure out their excuse - I don't think I'm alone on this one). Now, at last, the dark cloud has parted, and we can finally say - as a country - that we killed the man responsible for the attacks on the World Trade Center. It is sort of a national catharsis that I think we're in desperate need of, and I think it actually might have an amazing effect on our economy, the salty political discourse, as well as our foreign policy.
Step Two:
But then, if our goal is harm prevention, why should we wait until the harm has been caused before intervening? In other words, why doesn’t the following argument hold?
It’s April 30 – remind me of your 2012 writing resolutions. Have you followed them through? Are you even half way there? Or what do you think of postal submissions? But be quick because I have to get to the post office before the end of today because stamps are going up as I mentioned…quite a lot!
While I like the exposure on the Web ... Artfire in particular ... to share my wares ... every once in awhile I like to "get out there" & personally share my creations with the public!
Above is the loft. It is a half top floor. The living room area is open up til the knock and the half second floor is built as a social area with book shelves and comfy chairs. The computer is here and you can see the view of the Alps from the windows that we will put into that wooden part all the way from left to right. I will have window flowers pots with climbing geraniums. Like every Swiss person has.
Let us now consider some of the tactics the papacy is using to subvert the United States. Just because they call themselves a church does not mean that they are honest or honorable. Remember that Satan, the devil, gave the papacy their power and great authority (Revelation 13:2). The Catholics, through their Jesuits, are working to accomplish the exact opposite from what the Catholic Church claims they stand for. For instance, the church claims to be against abortion, but their Jesuits, working in secrecy and masquerading as regular citizens in the government, work to pass laws and make judicial rulings permitting abortion. They have their right hand fighting their left hand to thoroughly confuse the people of the United States and to keep the people from ever connecting this evil conspiracy with them. Here is another example. The pope gets on television and, acting very piously, prays for peace, while his Jesuits are behind the scenes stirring up all kinds of wars, conflicts and terrorism in the world.
One of the things that we learned most while in our photography program is that none of us shoots like the other. We can go into a shoot… stand right next to one another and aim and shoot the exact same subject, but come out with completely different images to work with. Not one photographer wants to shoot like another. We may have the same tastes in style but our photographs are as different as our signatures.
f) The prohibition for the Defendants to publish statements, photographs, or any other documentation that is allegedly connected to said book and video or said thesis.
Und nun die Inspirationswerke des Design-Teams.
The Arcane Society Series is one of the more unique ones I have read and Krentz keeps it interesting especially now that there are objects which are coming forward from the past and heading to the future in her other series.
year or so ago, the Northwest passage opened so wide that a flood of cargo vessels raced through it from China to Europe. And prospectors are sifting for treasures on the sea floor, where Peary once spent a summer dragging sledges over ice-continents in search of the Pole.
I loved watching my brothers play football when they were in college and I think athletics was our therapy while we grieved for our dad. One of my brothers is still very close friends with several of his teammates from SMU. I have just recently reconnected with some of the girls I played sports with. Our bodies are broken and we feel old injuries from the past but in our minds, we can run as fast as we ever did. Hiking is my new sport and the travel to new locations, the distance or altitude of a hike is my new challenge. It’s still a team sport in a way. I always have a friend to share it with and there is something about walking with someone who opens the mind and heart and soon inhibitions slip away to encourage meaningful and therapeutic conversation.
Refrigerate the hearts for about 2 hours or place in your freezer for 10 minutes. I usually do the freezer method, but I've been having problems with the chocolate coating cracking, so this time I chilled them in the refrigerator and there was no cracking! Definitely make certain they are nicely chilled before attempting to add the sticks.
The catch is some of the technology needed to build Corona doesn’t exist. But that’s changing. Recently, researchers and chip makers have shrunk optical communications devices so that they can be put onto chips. They’ve made chip-scale equivalents of cables, modulators, and detectors. “A lot of people have concentrated on individual devices,” said HP’s Fiorentino. “Now they’re starting to build circuits. It’s like going from the transistor to the integrated circuit.”
thats it!! Yum!!!
Wish you could spend some time wandering through the art galleries in NYC? Let me be your guide. I have recently been reviewing a number of the art exhibitions from the new season on NearSay and will continue to do so for the next few weeks. This new website covers the daily happenings in NYC and is written by locals for New Yorkers, visitors, and the just plain curious. Click here to see my posts and to sign up for daily newsletters.
At times like these Town Councils
Although I’d be willing to bet they woudn’t have cheered for his medal half so loudly if he’d displaced their beloved Sven in first place.
Her mother brought her closer and asked her to feel the carrots. She did and
Money Remaining: $291,653
The hills I walked were full of mist,
5. Get straight across bangs: Trimmed them to see if I'd like it, and then thought I couldn't pull them off so I just swished them to the side again.
It is critically important that you keep this file protected as well as your private key. If this revoke were to fall in the wrong hands, someone else could publish it to public servers and revoke your certificate without your knowledge. You should store a copy of your private key and a certificate revoke snippet offline on a removable drive and store it in a safe place. The best scenario is to throw the private key and revoke package into an encrypted file system on a thumb drive, and chuck that into a fire-proof safe.
With pressure mounting, I completely cracked and even broke down in front of my boss. When you are under a kind of stress that is practically unknown to 98% of the population, it is very hard to find people to relate too. And course, I had not yet competed, so I hadn’t really made any “fitness friends” that I could go to for support. I was tired, cranky and lacked motivation. My hormones weren’t helping either as I had discovered through my extensive research that women who were on birth control would hang on to excess fat due to the high levels of estrogen present in the “pill”. After nearly ten years, I quit the pill cold turkey.
With tan yarn
The Herald went to the courts to force department MEC Mlibo Qoboshiyane, who doubles as ANC provincial spokesperson, to release the report.
As they grow older, the exact dates of their first steps may fade in importance, but I can’t imagine the day I won’t cherish the memory of their still-damp after-bath kisses.
To all life’s first steps,
Past the counters are our appliances...freezer, washer and dryer.
but the desert drowns all in sea-ghost grain.
Suddenly I heard an explosion from where the D High School was and I saw a mushroom cloud like from a nuclear explosion, and then a flash & shock-wave moved across the area toward us; but I accidentally stopped and repeated this part of the dream, because I was afraid of us dying from the explosion.
What Kind of Mother Are You?
She's also had a few streets and a number of other government institutions like summer camps named in her honor, and there have been a number of books, television and radio programs in the PA controlled media about her 'heroic martyrdom.' She's regarded by Palestinian Arabs as a role model.
If you like your heroes sexy and your heroines feisty, than this is a definite must read. I am thrilled to see that we can expect a story for all nine of the Feral Warriors, sure to be one to meet every women’s fantasy. Check out my list of authors for a list of books and reading order.
‘In these poems, Mozart rubs shoulders with Hesiod, Cranach with Picabia, Nietzsche with Fitzgerald, Rodin with Rochegrosse. But what animates this first full collection is the constant and beguiling presence of the central character - arch-flâneur, would-be mauvais garçon, Lincolnshire small-town escapee, irreverent scholar - picking his way through these crowded streets, savouring his impressions of all that he encounters and inviting the reader to join him. Ahren Warner has almost invented a new kind of Fin de siècle’ – Annie Freud
(click on the above image for the larger poster view)
Straight-up it’s a simple point about unity despite variety. That phrase can be misused to dress up a mishmash of theological heterodoxy that’s actually got about as much unity as a joint Apple & Android staff team-building day. But in context here it captures the stunning and intentional variety of the one God lovingly manifesting himself in his people through various gifts.
This one truly gets under my skin. I used to ALWAYS go on the dance floor during the bouquet toss. Caught the toss a number of times too. Now I hide in the bathroom when its time to line up and show our singledom on the dance floor at receptions.
We...and the rose...lived quietly side by side for many years.
Jeff Anderson (Randal) is pompous and bombastic, being more than a little intense in his search for a laugh.
Rael-Buckley discovered the artist within her when she was in graduate school at the age of 40. An art history major, she took a handful of studio courses in Milwaukee and realized she had found her path in the clay room.
For myself, I can imagine plunging into some creative pursuits today, things that engage my emotions. I guess that might also be seen as being a bit debauched, when I should be focusing on paperwork. Ah well...
All you need to do is toddle on over there to see the inspiration the talented
But observers have pointed out that the new slogan bears strong similarities to MSNBC’s ‘Lean Forward’ as Obama ditches his successful 2008 motto – ‘Hope and Change’.
I would like to do a test run before the challenge begins...would one of you see if you can post a picture of something you made in the comment today?
Oh my. I don’t know…maybe that I’m almost sure I was a cat in another life?
Do you send thank you cards to your clients? A business that I know sent out thank you cards in November to celebrate Thanksgiving. They stood out by this approach.
Once each module is finished (finished ones have a tarp cover on them) a special tractor trailer will take one module at a time to the gin. In this case, gin is a place, not a drink. That's where the cotton lint is separated from the cotton seeds and bark.
Since people infected with HIV generally do not exhibit any symptoms until they get sick from opportunistic infections, everyone should be tested for HIV on a regular basis. In NCTE and the Task Force’s survey, almost 10% of the respondents indicated that they did not know their HIV status. Usually, HIV tests require a blood sample but some tests use urine or saliva instead. Some tests take a few days for results, but rapid HIV tests can provide results in approximately 20 minutes.
67. Nouvelle Vague - Road To Nowhere (3:12)
I would say I’m lucky to have ALL the music in my life! What or who is YOUR favorite????
2 degree
Pour the batter in a pre greased baking pan, and bake it for abt 35-40 minutes.
Join E-F and produce till C such that B-C =F-G = 15” or to taste.
Tucked down one end of the Eating World food court in Chinatown, is a small stall decorated only with a hanging red curtain and a menu printed on a huge cardboard sign. Gumshara serves traditional Japanese ramen, and in the short time since opening, has gathered a legion of devoted followers.
It’s a time, Now,
“Where are you from?” I asked, trying to be polite and make conversation.
Don’t forget to pop across to the Ideas to Inspire blog for more sneak peeks. I’ll be back later tonight with a new candy and tomorrow to show another of the soon to be released sentiments, Laila sure has done a totally amazing job with these!
In 651 Oswin, king of Deira was murdered by the soldiers of King Oswiu of Bernicia, and subsequently his body was brought to Tynemouth for burial. He became St Oswin and his burial place became a shrine visited by pilgrims. He was the first of the three kings buried at Tynemouth.
This year I decided to try to make our deck more pleasing and inviting....in hopes
I go to the beach alone, which at first feels like bliss but then I start to feel vulnerable. C joins me and our bags are stolen.
I seriously feel like a weight was instantly lifted. Since it was a quick clean up I was able to successfully tackle several other things on my list. It was a good afternoon. Next up, the terrifying hall closet.
Plate pasta in the center of a bowl. Prop the octopus tentacle on top and garnish with chopped parsley. Serve with sliced bread and eat immediately!
The Yiddish Policeman's Union by Michael Chabon reviewed by Jimmy Callaway
It is a good idea to dishinguish between three types of poses. First there is the posed pose, then there is the unposed pose and finally there is the provoked pose.
How many best sellers are relegated to nothing with the passing of time? Very few will ever be there being read in the library at the end of the universe.
In your car put any clutter on the drivers seat. Man talk about a nuisance.
Grace, you are just a way cool kid. I really love you and I hope that you have a really fantastic 9th birthday today. I can't wait to watch you test for your Orange Sash in karate tonight! That will be a great birthday present. You have definitely earned it and waited a long time for it.
Tears and grief were uncontrollable as Dickie fell to his knees between the tracks. He nudged Splasher and the only motion was that initiated by his urging. He had only heard about death now he felt its thrust. He wept and sobbed. He could not move. He didn’t want to move. He thought his presence would somehow bring him back to life. A flood a memories rushed in on him; running, wrestling, jumping, petting, and chasing – all the things a boy does with his dog.
So as I jump right into the Christmas spirit, I will continue to shake my Jingle Bells and share holiday cheer.
not that I don’t want to pay. I can’t.
Reading the detail of the LRGP patent, it’s clear this was at least partly a surprise discovery. The Patent states the discovery was “based on lab testing of another hydraulic suspension device”, when it was found that the effect of the fluid within the system “has a very significant inertia effect”.
But as I am sure that would (probably not) bore me at some point, I believe (c) I'd love to meet someone who could make me laugh and make me see things in a different light. Sometimes life seems monotonous and I would imagine longevity would make it worse, so meeting someone who truly sees life for what it could be and brings that to others, that's what I would love to see.
We had another fun day at homeschool soccer today. Nathan was not there so I was not able to get as many photos as I would have liked to. It is quite funny to me though because I am the ONLY person that I have seen taking photos of their kids playing soccer. I did see one Mom last week with a video camera, but that is it. They all look at me like I must be crazy. Ha ha.
US regulators have approved use of a powerful Johnson & Johnson antibiotic to treat plague, an extremely rare, sometimes-deadly bacterial infection.
In the last couple of years I’ve dedicated myself to teaching belly dance to others and sharing what I know. It also entailed owning and running a belly dance studio which, running any business, takes all of one’s time. Unfortunately, performance opportunities were few and far between in Mississippi and so I’ve felt a little rusty in the performance aspect of my belly dance career. This is where my Snohomish performance comes in. While there are sometimes events in Bellingham to perform at, I wanted to get out of town to be able to perform and meet more dancers from the Seattle area.
Everything has just collapsed in on me. I doubt I’ll reopen this blog, but I do still get updates when people like posts or comment. I don’t know what to do anymore. I’m at a standstill. Even though I’m doing things and working towards college, a license, a car, and a job…. it feels as though I’m watching someone else do it.
* Grab your current read
Jayme lives and works in Sacramento, California where she creates wonderful little imaginary scenes we all would like to travel to. She illustrates unique characters then brings them to life. The final product are hand cut creatures so lovable, you wish you could be transformed as well.
1 tea cinnamon
I also ordered online some coconut oil - 2 tubs from amazon = $41.00
We’ve stumbled and laughed near the abandoned warehouse we're the weeds grow out of control,
Ok, well that's my update. Hopefully I will now be a better blogger!! Who knows, maybe one day I'll even finish that meme!
*Checks will take longer to clear than money orders so expect time for that to happen. Make sure you list exactly what card you are wanting to have.
1169 ***D-VIII/10/1993. “The Appearances of Nature in Aristophanes’ Clouds.” Great Books Program Staff Meeting, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-7, above, pp. 199-210 (1997). An inappropriate type-face for the letter epsilon is used several times in ibid., pp. 209-10.)
Tennis:
“Do you have your own cello?”
half teaspoon of baking powder,
left aligned, regular spacing,
2. Save the Dates – have them printed, addressed (myself) and sent off to wedding guests before this month is over! B- Ok, so I’ve only seen Save the Dates as a PDF, BUT I was at the mercy of couple other people’s time that are just giving me their free time. I had all my parts done (how I wanted them to look a.k.a. my own design and samples of my handwriting) and hopefully I will have them very, very soon! I can’t wait for people to see them!!!
Later Hex is in the jail cell asking what became of the store owner. The sheriff explains that he reasoned with the man and his distance and silence would be insured. Hex then asks what is to become of him. The sheriff tells his goons to do their best.
So I'm afraid I need to make myself sparse here again for the next month or two. Thank you for your patience!
This movie came as a surprise package which both charmed and entertained me for two hours.
I carved that fight on a reindeer bone
Not good: when we don’t address the core beliefs, we are not affirming, we are NEEDING…we don’t actually believe our affirmations.
Think about what you've read so far. Does it reinforce what you already know about Accessories Hill? Or was there something completely new? What about the remaining paragraphs?
Hold up the mic, not the baton check it up now
1 stoppered
Corregidor - written by Sergeant Ben Waldron about his experiences as a P.O.W.
About EMG
“Jana!” She began. “Guess what? I know what we are supposed to DO with our lives! Call me!”
Preheat oven to 375. While oven heats, spray the bottom and sides of pie dish with non-stick cooking spray. Then spread refried beans on the tortilla and put the tortilla (bean side up) into the baking dish. Next sprinkle half of the cheese over the beans. In a bowl combine the milk, eggs and the rest of the cheese and whisk together until well combined. Then mix in the chopped spinach and stir to combine. The spinach should be cut into large bite size pieces. Next pour the entire egg mixture over the tortilla and beans and bakes in the 375 degree oven for 18 minutes. After 18 minutes, turn the oven up to 425 and bake for an additional 5-7 minutes or until it is golden brown and puffed up a bit.
And they are three sweaty, hot, topless chicks.
Ours are not nearly so impressive, but here is what we have enjoyed in our yard this winter/spring.
You are going to cut down on government spending – after the gazillion trillion budget passes.
True horsemen understand all aspects of the sport, not just their own small corner of it.
Canteen - cafeteria.
He recently completed his 3,000th concert of his long career.
This morning, I was forwarded six pages worth of dress code requirements for Pi Phi’s Cornell chapter.
Sue Armstrong has kindly agreed to answer a few questions about the book (and the usual general matters) below, but first the biography.
Curiously, my Sigma 70-200mm f2.8 EX HSM which is now over 10 years old worked perfectly. However I lost AF in live view on my 10-20mm superwide but that wasn’t something that bothered me as that lens is nearly always MF only and I rarely ever use live view either.
The strength of this view is that it is very broad and speaks to the general principle that God does not want His people to marry people who don’t believe in Him. Certainly, that point is being made here. The weakness of this view (I think) is that it’s not quite specific enough to deal with what seems to be happening here. God seems very upset about this event, there’s got to be more going on here…
She definitely came to the right place, ha! There was no way I was going to let this gorgeous top go to waste.
Carrie Fundingsland – I love what’s happening in landscape design – people using indigenous plants, growing their own food, creating outdoor living spaces. I think it’s so exciting. I’m working on a project right now that has an entire kitchen, dining and living room in the garden. It’s so much fun!
Author: Stephen King
At Blenheim Lodge, we are still advertising last minute vacancies for the May Bank Holiday long weekend. For overseas readers of this post who are unaware of this UK public holiday, May Bank Holiday weekend is named for the Bank Holiday on 7th May, with the long 3-day weekend starting on Friday, 4th May. If the good weather in Windermere continues, then this long weekend would be a great one for roaming the Lakes and exploring its many treasures.
Mental note: Cut off the 5/8 inch seam allowance on the outer edge before placing the final bias tape. I’m leaving it for now – to allow this seam allowance to ravel during the construction and manipulation of the coat.
Hmm, somewhat of a bitchy post. I guess I am somewhat of a ‘judger’, but it is what gets me through, and I certainly don’t make any pretense as to being a gorgeous amazonian woman myself. Technical clothing bears some consideration, that’s all!
12 December
I have to say, it wasn't all that bad. He offered up his seat at the bar, like a true gentleman and flagged the bar tender over to take my drink order. Paid for my beverage. When our table was ready, he took out my seat and ordered a fantastic bottle of wine to go with dinner. The conversation was relaxed and easy, and then I made a joke. The laugh that came from the person sitting in front of me made me want to run for the high hills! I was not only loud, but had this quality of being high pitched, nasal'y and throat'y all at the same time. I was literally the kind of laugh that makes you cringe from the inside-out. I nervously chuckled, looked around the room to see that people's heads had actually turned and realized that this extreme laugh would take this guy down a long road of lonely unhappiness.
Reduce the heat to medium low and simmer for 10 minutes.
You can't kill them all out, but you can make them run out of funds because they spend them on the wrong objective.
Specialized Design Services
In the 50 years since oil was discovered in Nigeria, over $400 billion have been realised as revenue but the money has been stolen by the politicians and the corrupt civil servants leaving Nigerians to fend for themselves. The evil genius Abacha and his family were able to bank $4 billion of these monies in Switzerland, Jersey Island, New York, Australia, France and Britain. The story is no different in Angola, Equatorial Guinea, Ghana, DRC, Guinea, Chad, Zambia, Sudan, Liberia, Ivory Coast, Egypt, Algeria, Sierra Leone and Gabon where oil, gas, gold, diamond, copper and other valuable minerals have brought in billions of dollars yet most the people live in abject poverty. The people are poor because the Slave Masters have decided they should remain so, as monies meant for their development have been stolen and are sitting in UBS, Credit Suisse, Barclays bank, BNP, Crédit Lyonnais and Citibank.
Last Sunday at Mass I was confronted with the above question. As it happened it was a day when I was in quite a bit of physical pain. The pain didn’t start out to be really bad. I would be all right walking to church, so I thought. But far from it. After walking the distance, which took about twenty-five minutes, the pain was getting quite considerable. I arrived at the church at the last minute. But Father was still standing there shaking hands. He shook my hand too.
Needless to say, I will only be sharing the one card with you today:
What I will say to my client, who I truly do like and respect is: "The objectives of my company have changed, and while it has been a pleasure to serve you, I can not serve you again."
So, that is a review. Let's talk about the negative "reviews" that authors have been lashing out at. They often involve animated gifs, swearing, and snark. They're often quite funny. But here's the thing, though. When a blogger writes a biased, hilarious, snarky rundown of a book they despised, he/ she is not writing a review. They are writing a post about a book. I'm not saying that bloggers shouldn't write biased, hilarious, snarky rundowns of books. I'm saying that those rundowns are not reviews. Bloggers who regularly write them cannot expect to garner the same respect and treatment from authors that pro reviewers or non-pro reviewers do. They can't expect authors to read their posts and learn something from them. And they cannot expect authors to not take it personally. They've made it personal.
The MVD (Motor Vehicle Division) in Surprise is every bit as obnoxious as the DMV (Department of Motor Vehicles) in Idaho. They hire vicious, surly folks there. (Excuse me if any of you work at such a place but it is true, and you know it.)
This past weekend I joined an anthropology class in a field trip to the ruins of Volubilis, a Roman-occupied city inhabited by native Moroccans that is at least 2000 years old. The ruins were amazing, and we got a good feel for how people used to live; the largest houses were something out of a Hollywood movie, with giant courtyards and fountains. Among the residences, a Roman bath house, triumphal arch, forum, and basilica still stand today. After the ruins we ate lunch in Moulay Idriss, the nearest town which is built into the mountains lining the valley. It is not so dissimilar to Chefchaouen, except is only an hour away, so some of us were thinking about spending the weekend there for hiking and camping. It’s by far the least touristy city I’ve seen in Morocco.
Her mother Katy, a speech pathologist who is married to Michael, another speech pathologist, said that most people don't believe their infant is a reader.
Our tomatoes have not been too great this year
Werewolf in the North Woods (Wild About You Series #2)
The film will be released in about two theaters nationwide this month. What a pity. Watch the trailer here.
Twentieth Century Fox Home Entertainment, LLC (TCFHE) is a recognized global industry leader and a subsidiary of Twentieth Century Fox Film Corporation, a News Corporation company. Representing 75 years of innovative and award-winning filmmaking from Twentieth Century Fox, TCFHE is the worldwide marketing, sales and distribution company for all Fox film and television programming, acquisitions and original productions on DVD, Blu-ray Disc Digital Copy, Video On Demand and Digital Download. The company also releases all products globally for MGM Home Entertainment. Each year TCFHE introduces hundreds of new and newly enhanced products, which it services to retail outlets from mass merchants and warehouse clubs to specialty stores and e-commerce throughout the world.
going down to the forest
1/3 cup fresh orange juice
Talent Spec (please discuss any unusual talent choices):
In a bowl toss the cheeses with the flour and reserve the mixture. In a large heavy saucepan cook the onion with the butter over low heat, stirring, until it is softened and clear (do not burn), add the beer, the can of Rotel, and the peppers (jalapeño), and simmer the mixture for 5 minutes. Add the reserved cheese mixture by 1/2 cupfuls to the beer mixture, stirring after each addition until the cheeses are melted, serve the dip with the chips.
Use this 5 steps daily in your business or career and others may one day come pay to hear you SPEAK.
The real world doesn’t work like this. There are no shortcuts in life. You don’t get a big reward for each tiny action. Real rewards take real work.
1/2 cup raw, shaved coconut
“the veil separating the Holy of Holies from the rest of the Tabernacle fell behind him again, shutting him out for another year.”
* 1/2 cup butter
But while relaxing, her hand dangled in between the cushions, where she felt the snake wriggling around. She screamed and fainted, the snake rushed back under the sofa.
Society doesn’t teach us to communicate effectively any more. Notice I said effectively as people communicate more now as opposed to any other time in our past. It’s the manner in which they communicate that creates a problem. People would rather send a text than pick up the phone or read an update on Facebook rather than ask you how your day went. I am guilty of this myself in many ways. I text and use Facebook and there is nothing wrong with that, but developing good communication skills is an integral part of building relationships. Since making sales depends on building long and short term relationships and since everything in life is a sale it is an integral part of life.
She started painting the tails of the mice we caught. You think I'm joking? I am not. I presume she ran out of microchips and scanners so mum just started dabbing their tails in paint, on account of the fact we'll know if we get any re-runs.
What you don't know is...that I'm a liberal-minded Mormon who used to dress weird and listens to indie music, anything different.
“How do I hear God’s voice?”
You would think its troubles were over. Not so fast. In a whole year it grew only a few inches, while the other plants grew by leaps and bounds, as if to mock the little seed. Every fall it lost its leaves. In winter it barely survived, covered with snow. And as it got a little taller, it had to go through windstorms and blizzards.
"We are not without means to reciprocate," he said.
The full text of this article is available online at:
And time for something strong and new,
Etsy.com is a Web site dedicated to handmade, vintage items. You know, crafts, paintings, sewing, decorations, clothing, etc. So if you are creative and want to make some money, you can start up your own online store which is what my in-laws did.
Sandra Skurvida, Bard College, Fashion Institute of Technology, and School of Visual Arts
Floral perfume, neck-warmed and drifting to tempt.
One of my earliest Christmas memories is of my father singing We Three Kings in his deep brown bass voice. This is a Celtic instrumental version which I rather love…
And just as we were about to go back home, somewhere below tall buildings with yellow cabs and ambulances rushing past us on Broadway, it hit me like a sledgehammer: the memory of how the sky would look during clear nights in the garden of our summer house. The memory of a million glittering stars, and my father calmly pointing out the various constellations as if on a map on the kitchen table. "We'll go there some day" he said and I trusted him. All I see on this light polluted city sky is clouds and airplanes, my feet are steadily on the ground in lustrous high heels. It's another sort of dream and I'll never be able to fly.
We started the meeting with the election of officers. I'm so excited - Igor and Beryl are going to do the newsletter for next year. I got a call several months ago from Lorene, asking if I'd be willing to accept the nomination of president. We are a small guild and everyone has had a turn at the offices. I've been lurking. I felt it only fair to say yes, since I've never served in any office and this guild has fed me for a very long time. So ta-da - the 2012/2013 prez is I. In with the new.
See, it's all punk rock in the end.
To make a short story long, they had a meeting, during which it was minuted that a. the shop was too far away and b. the crowd was too big and c. they had no money and d. the only food that could be found was on a little boy. They came with these minutes to the Master.
Who flutters by
2 oz feta cheese crumbled (1/2 c)
Sturluson S (Translated by Faulkes A, 2000) Edda, Everyman, London.
Claire, Ty’s friend – she’s very secretive, full of potential. I felt I ‘knew’ her less than any other character. I loved having the chance to find out more about her in Almost True.
Annalisa is a writer and fitness instructor and a lovely chatty blogger so please go and visit her blog. I promise you won’t be disappointed.
I think I am falling in love with Kristin Cronin-Barrow. I just bought like 6 of her kits. I love her style and they work perfectly with my pics of Kristin. This is from her kit Cherry Sweet.
After I thought I was done, I decided to make the envelope cute as well. The edges were distressed with "Peeled Paint" and a little "Faded Jeans". I found an extra alligator leftover from the card, so I adhered it to the envelope and added some more stickles for the eyes. It only took a couple of minutes to make the envelope and I think it adds so much to the finished project. I hope my nephew likes it!
Found a place, and the guy who owned it was very friendly. They got the tire off and found the problem. A huge screw was lodged in the tire towards the edge. After mush deliberation, S was in Rome and unavailable, I decided that the best option was to buy a new tire. This was the same day mom and I were meant to go to Sandy Beach and snorkel. So we got slightly delayed, but decided to make a break for it as soon as we got back home, and to stop at Ibn Battuta to get the rest of what we needed.
Note: The book from the earlier mini-challenge (below) is standing face-forward on the bottom shelf in this photo. Aren't I creative?
Night passed and morning came. That was the first day. No hangover. Something was wrong.
Alcohol By Volume : 6.60%
Bisognano: Again, I’d tell them that their risk for hypertension is the result of a constellation of factors. While it might be their “destiny” to some degree, even relatives swimming in the same gene pool exhibit varying levels of risk. It is certainly possible to delay the “inevitable” by adhering to healthy lifestyle habits (again, limiting salt intake, maintaining a healthy weight, and keeping up with regular aerobic exercise). What’s more, modern medicine offers many good drugs – with few side effects, and low cost – so it’s worth meeting with your physician to discuss a prevention or treatment plan that suits you.
Punk and Beyond runs from 25th of November to December 17th with live music performances on Saturdays from several of the artists on show - ..
II Cor. 3:17 Now the Lord is the Spirit, and where the Spirit of the Lord is, there is freedom.
- a top zip closure
NAMA declined to provide the Independent with comment on the document which gave rise to the report. Elsewhere in the Independent today, the paper’s legal affairs correspondent Dearbhail McDonald reports on the “arsenal” available to NAMA to get at the wife’s share of the family home, in reality it’s a list of hurdles. You might also be interested in these previous entries on developers wives
(And for those skeptics out there, I have the fortune cookie to prove it. “There is only one happiness in life: to love and to be loved.” You can’t argue with the ancient wisdom of the Chinese. Sorry. This is a serious subject, but I couldn’t resist. I really do have the fortune on my frig door.)
off black hearts
I think the year would be 1990 that I rediscovered stitching. My first piece of stitching from that far back was a counted cross-stitch kit of a bowl of very colorful tulips on aida cloth. I still have the piece hidden away in the back of the cupboard, where I am very sure it will stay with lots of other finished kits to keep it company.
-You pass a group of teenage girls you say a prayer that ankle length dresses and high collars make a comeback
I don't know if I will even like or find a karate training spreadsheet useful. Only time will tell...
Starts on 4/30 12:01 AM EST – 5/4 11:59 PM EST
evanhamilton In our product, we’ve built in game mechanics that encourage our customers when they make their customers happy.
This is the same psychological control mechanism that is brought to bear when “racist”, “Islamophobe”, “xenophobe”, and the other smear words of liberalism’s “hate speech” crimethink are deployed. There is one difference with “anti-semite”: it is the strongest and most hypocritical smear of all. Jews are the longest lasting, most powerful, most cohesive group in human history. Those facts are not unrelated. This historically paranoid group sees and encounters enemies everywhere, but they have in contemporary times convinced even non-Jews to spot and silence their critics. For them to be the only group that has a specially designated and almost religiously observed protection clause (anti-semitism) is perfectly understandable, but the particularity of the “crime” flies in the face of the spirit used to justify defining it as such. The most virulent form of this bigotry (anti-anti-semitism) is self-defeating, if not flatly anti-everybody-else.
Coach your child to touch your arm and keep going "Please, to listen to me this is important". Now you get irritated and say "Can't you see I’m busy!?"
John stood in the doorway, wide-eyed and dumbstruck.
In China, they break the spines of newborns, they bury them alive, strangle and poison them, or just starve them to death. All of that mostly happens to girls, because the birth of a baby girl in China is economically unprofitable.
I also pulled my medieval novel, ISOLDE AND OWEN, published last September, down from Amazon and Smashwords. I’ll re-publish it in a week or so, when I have the new cover and new product description ready to go (new title, too.)
“@Orbinho: Nicklas Bendtner has scored six goals in his last seven Carling Cup appearances”.
Changing topics...
Ugh, I didn't want to answer the door.
Cream CS from Fabriano for the base....
A huge possible downside to a resurgent America is that politicians will be remain reluctant to enact needed reforms, and the immigration disaster will continue.
With the cuts being made to the HSE, pro-active assessments of workplaces is going to be less likely. So bad employers will seemingly have less to fear from criminal prosecutions. The reduction in the number of accidents reported will no doubt suggest that an improvement in health and safety has occurred. The reality will be that health and safety will have been relegated below profit.
MECH SERVA and IO REMIDIOS: I can’t wait to spend more time with you guys in 2012, I love you two plus FC very much. Thank you for making me feel loved.
The Giant wandered off to investigate the state of the cottonwoods… and crows cried and circled over head as set about my business.
One suggested, 'Train yourself to have a long attention span' and quoted Mahatma Gandhi: 'Earth provides enough to satisfy every man's need, but not every man's greed'.
Yesterday Kat asked me to explain something to her about it. I did. And then last night I dreamed I was with her again. I woke up with a start. Today I find myself with 100 yard stare. I feel raw, exposed, cut down, abused. I feel the sickness I felt when I was with her. I feel small and scared and weird.
Signals: Simplex 2903 with Simplex chime & CH-70 chime.
Each budget we can never be fair, but in the budget, I want to look at how you manage the money, wisely. Not giving out tactically. With such budget, all ministries will be sure to out perform, so we better be prepared for a high performance bonus. No one can fail, first in a budget for the future, or a budget with no Ooomp, no push in it. To me the ministry of finance is too lax in using our money.
I guess I'm feeling a little bit...blah! I think these bright a** pants are an attempt to bust out of my rut. This outfit felt like me but a little different from what I normally wear. Does that make sense?
Lifestyle
Dennis Pierce, Editor
4. Come over about 2 in the afternoon, hold the baby while I have a hot shower, put me to bed with the baby and then fold all the piles of laundry that have been dumped on the couch, beds or in the room corners. If there’s no laundry to fold yet, do some.
So you should not look too much on the price of something, but you should look at the utility (or happiness) it gives you compared to other products with similar price.
I should be elated. I should be able to congratulate her. But instead I am green with envy. So jealous that it hurts. They spent the weekend at the lake with us and everytime they brought it up I just walked away. The whole family is just thrilled that they finally got what they deserve. For now, I can't be.
So, and now where is the update for the Christmas challenge? Do you still want to know it? I thought, by telling you, what a great weekend I had, you would forget about the challenge update. (ahm...) Ok, I will be honest with you and tell you, that I gained two pounds in this past week, mainly on the weekend. But this time I don't regret it. I won't get that Dairy Queen Ice Cream for the next YEARS! (yeah, maybe at least 1 year...). So, I had to make the most out of this opportunity. :-) hahaha
Out of all the students, Yunu is the moodiest. He gets frustrated easily, though out of all of them he probably has the highest level. He and Guncheol seem to be good friends, the kind that joke around and give each other shit. At least, that's what it looks and sounds like, considering my Korean is not much better than their English. They might be actually fighting for all I can tell.
Download this app now for a highly interactive, enjoyable session of storytelling, social interaction and sensemaking. Outcomes will include recorded stories, lessons learned organised by emergent themes with optional problem solving and action planning. You will then be on the road to ‘learning before, during and after’ with demonstrable examples of money saving, collaborative, efficiency gaining interventions.
Association pour la santé publique du Québec - For upholding the values and principles of CIMS' One Voice Campaign by integrating the Mother-Friendly Childbirth Initiative into the Québec Public Health Association and it's key role in the success of Enfanter Le Monde/ Birthing The World: An Interdisciplinary Conference on Best Practices in Perinatal Care (Québec City, Canada, November 25-26, 2010).
At the end of the day as long as the fucking scoreboard lists mode-specific stats, so in Domination, Captures besides K/D, I’m happy. That’s a small, yet asbsoutely huge, crucial feature that was in Black Ops and is missing in Modern Warfare 3. Some of us, actually many of us, do not play TDM or free for all, we play objective-based modes where you should score more for doing the actual objectives instead of kills. So, surely those stats should also be listed!
I learned that knitting in public is considered rude by many, if not most, people. I don't quite know how to handle this information.
display the black purple lips,
Coz if the norm is lady gaga, then we're all in danger
When you get out of bed, everything hurts.
What were the writers thinking when they wrote that shit? 5 year olds watch that show..
Mr van Zyl did not obtain the officers's name but note his vehicle as BMW registration no VYL 487GP and his badge no as 51370.
As the school year came to an end we were surprised and honored that the senior class of Laconia Christian School dedicated their yearbook to us! It read:
I just finished up a stint of jury duty here in Clark County, assigned to a murder trial. Three days of mainly sitting waiting. The first day was in the jury lounge, then in mid afternoon called up to a courtroom for the initial talk. Second day was questions by the judge and some by the attorneys, with a lot of people being excused for cause and thanked for their service. I was impressed with the average juror, and how evidently nobody gets to talk in their real lives as so many had quite convoluted stories they were very anxious to share with the courtroom, as when we were asked if we had any relatives that were arrested there were a lot of stories like ‘my wife’s third cousin twice removed that we haven’t seen in fifteen years once got a ticket for jay walking in Cleveland’ or something else equally traumatic. Well, there is one woman who’s brother is on death row in Arizona for a murder but he is appealing because of the evidence so it can be dropped back to life in prison and because of the appeal they shipped him to California to be on trial for another murder and her other brother is also on trial for murder in California but that was a different crime and the cops framed them, so she was excused. Yesterday we had to be there early but ended up sitting on the hard metal benches in the hallway in front of the courtroom until called in right at noon to be told there was new evidence that came to light over the weekend (for a crime that occurred in February 2010) and because of that the attorneys had long discussions and there was a plea deal made and we weren’t needed so thank you for your service, then another long wait back in the jury lounge to be signed out.
2. Roberto Cavalli for H&M
Whether the family-as-superheroes set-up is seen as a metaphor for the mid-life crisis or the debate about private versus public responsibility, whether it's ultimately an expression of Mom-stay-at-home chauvinism or you-can-have-it-all feminism, the fact is that The Incredibles draws a great deal of its power and appeal from an engagement with real-world issues grounded in recognisable human experiences. In that, Elastigirl's not just an invigoratingly compelling character, but also the clearest example that the superhero sub-genre can be used to discuss the broadest range of social situations, including even the most apparently unremarkable and everyday of debates. Yet where does the super-book touch upon any such issues with any such lightness of touch and spirit of sheer good fun? There's a hint of the same in Hickman's Fantastic Four, while there's a great deal more of a similar substance in Simone's Welcome To Tranquilly. Elsewhere the reader struggles to recognise anything of the situations and issues put to use in The Incredibles at all, unless it's to recognise the likes of the murdered-by-superheroine husband in Birds Of Prey or the apparently centuries worth of dead male baby bodies in Wonder Woman. The family is typically a source of at best frustration and at worse trauma in the super-book, while mothers are either burdens to be supported, jailers to be escaped or ghosts to faux-tragically mourn and avenge. Whatever the strengths and limitations of its politics, the family metaphor at the heart of the Incredibles generates powerful emotions and stimulates fundamental questions, whereas so much of the sub-genre's traditional fare works to narrow down the same to a safe, unthreatening, bloke-exciting blur of grit'n'grind'n'bloodlust.
Fair to middling is a term I often heard my mother use, and I still use it. Examples of its usage are found in literary works by Mark Twain and Louisa May Alcott, to name a couple. It seems to have originated in the early 1800’s, from what I can glean, and means something that is moderate to average in quality. Sorta like this post, I guess.
Then we went to the revision session, which was useful but seemed to go very quickly. Lizzie was there (I just seem to be running into her everywhere this week – maybe a sign pointing me towards Melissa? Or an obstacle in front of Heather? I just don’t know), as well as Jenny R. Gaby also came, but I didn’t talk to her. We haven’t really talked at all since the UCAS Convention. I left when it was over, but most of the others stayed for the next one. I walked up to the bus stop with Oscar and his friend (who I met before but couldn’t, and still can’t, remember the name of), before leaving him at the lights and meeting Gemma at the bus stop. She was ill :/ She’d been at Harry’s house, resting for the last hour or so :/ She’s got a flu of some kind, but she looked terrible :( She is coming in for a Geography Mock tomorrow, but I doubt will make it to Geology :/ Hopefully she gets better by next week, and I just hope I don’t get ill between now and the exams :/
Barry Edward Fraser April 3, 1943 to July 20, 2010. Rest soundly, my love.
“Pay no attention to that search engine behind the curtain!”
Most species of butterflies and moths require particular host plants. The monarch butterfly requires milkweed to feed on in the larval stage. Predators are deterred by the toxicity given to it by the milkweed. It carries this toxicity into the butterfly stage of its life. The viceroy butterfly has evolved to mimic the monarch. This also protects it from predators.
Ok, I know you're not supposed to announce that you have been ignoring your blog for almost a month, but...I'm announcing it!
I guess I can give ONE opinion...I think he looks better with short hair!
I left my apartment this morning for class (at 8:23 when I have class at 8:30. Ooops!) and felt like I was jetted to England so chilly and dreary and overcast and wet it was. It’s Heaven. I love this kind of weather. Especially when it’s so rare here in Sunny Spain.
Sadness
Vuillard’s artistic career began in La Belle Epoque from 1890 to the end of World War One, and ended with the German occupation of France. His focus was the acute observation of society.
Hopefully, when you are asked these questions and the many more that come up, you are able to answer confidently and knowledgeably. But what if you’re not too sure yourself? Then you should run to your bookstore (or your computer or iPad or Kindle or Nook, whatever) and get yourself a copy of a wonderful new book about Vegan nutrition.
Meet James.
Cooper and Me Winter Adventure would be a perfect Christmas gift for any child plus part of your proceeds will go to a great cause: $1 of every Winter Adventure book sold will go to advance research & treatment of pancreatic cancer, via the Lustgarten Foundation (http://www.lustgarten.org/)
I have come to realize how uninformed I am about TEA. It is very much intertwined into every culture with varieties that one cannot begin to explain. So I can’t claim i have found The Best Tea in the World yet, but i can claim i have found the one that best fits with me for the time being. Purple Cane Jasmine Tea, strong and flowery.
On the 18th of April 2012, it was Schifanoia’s turn to entertain the public with Baroque recorder music.
What’s your favorite fried food indulgence? I began to ponder this question about 2 weeks into my diet. This may have been an effort to conjure up the aroma of foods that I so love in order to pretend that I am tasting them. May have been. Anyway, after careful consideration I have decided upon my favorite. Crunchy, delicious, Southern Fried Chicken. There is something almost therapeutic about biting into a crunchy piece of chicken and getting to the juicy delicious chicken meat. It’s such a simple food, but oh so tasty – and pairs just fantastically with mashed potatoes, gravy, green beans, macaroni & cheese, potato salad……well…..you get my point. Oh, and sweet tea – you must have sweet tea.
This comes from one of my favorite bloggers MJ at Memoirs of an Evil Stepmom who hangs many notches on her belt when it comes to awards and always has something interesting to say when I drop by to say hello. Please do this yourself when you get a chance and check out the others bloggers websites as they’re all excellent places to find yourself in a quiet moment.
Is it not?
“They can just roll up to the speakerbox, state the type of assault they have in mind, and we’ll be ready for them when they get to the window,” he said. “We’re very friendly here in Wisconsin, and will do everything in our power to make these visitors comfortable.”
Her pastures shall manure,
To my friends and family who love me, I am known as a passer-outer. I'm not proud of it. It is, as they say, what it is. I faint when I get scared because I breath-hold or over-breathe and end up with what's known as a vasovagal response. (I know it's wikipedia, but trust me, it's close enough).
Any which way
and all first year design students are forced into doing a three-day design camp, which is starting today and where I'll be for the remainder of this week instead of finishing a project which really needs much more attention before it's monday due date.
This is one of the best parts of my job – not only do I get to give people back money they lost or didn’t even know they had through Unclaimed Property , my office supports public schools by turning over millions of dollars each year.
Life´s too go(o)d - One Little Indian/Electra, 1988.
"Abuelita. I like Grandmas."
Least likely to: Work for the Icelandic Tourist Board.
I guess the main thing that’s been bothering me all day is the war, the Middle East. It’s such a complicated subject. We’re supposed to be out of there, but there are still so many contractors getting away with having people in there and continuing to commit atrocities. When is it ever going to stop? Why do people join the army? Would there be such high entrance into the army if higher education was free?
Time to show people the skills that local home brewers have!
On the other hand, their life is (too) full of rules for me (rules because ....?? or only because of traditions), the simple life might not always be what it looks like....but still....
"We shall not examine whether such hops ought to be called more delicate, or weaker than those of other districts." (8)
Baby you don’t know me, cause you’re dead wrong
"No," he said, as he withdrew the letters. He pointed to the doorframe. "You owe me 170 pesos." (About 50 cents at the time.)
Typically because others have jumped into bed with the Tories this has led to the SNP crying foul over anti-Nationalist coalitions.
So, there you go—the leaders in the clubhouse for 2010. Several marquee releases await (seriously, just release the new Franzen already), but someone's going to have to bring some serious heat to top Matterhorn.
Do you currently keep your receipts “organized” in a “system” that involves your back pocket followed by a shoebox until tax time? Time to upgrade, with an app like iXpenseIt. “It makes it easy for me to snap quick photos of receipts while I’m on the road, categorize them and send it to my virtual assistant for filing and client billing. There is no need to save paper receipts, make copies and manually fill in spreadsheets,” says Casey Smith, marketing strategist.
That's why I came on a special trip today, because you and your mother are having a difficult Christmas this year without your daddy and brother. I though you both needed extra love and attention."
Pours a fairly deep, loosely filtered reddish brown with a nice tan head. Big, bready smell.
Our Lord will never leave us, but there is a danger that we will leave him, and so it is very important that we daily refresh our relationship with God. Turn to him continuously for guidance. Pray to him and praise him, acknowledging our Lord as our King and Saviour. If we allow him to breathe life and light into the very core of our beings, then we will never be separated from our Lord and his family.
Pisht. These people are lucky. Me, I was lucky if Dex slept more than 40 minutes at a time during the day! Things started to improve a little at about 3 months old, but prior to that, nope. He was pretty good at night though, and I would take a good night sleeper over a good day sleeper anytime!
1/2 (of a 21 oz can) cherry pie filling
Of course, there’s also the argument that there are plenty of women in the US who also have relationship dynamics that are similar.
In these four verses (John 17:20-23) Jesus mentions unity seven times. And why does He deem unity so important? So that the world may believe that You have sent Me . . . and have loved them even as You have loved me. Doesn’t that seem like a lot of what the world DOESN’T believe?
One evening’s ticket
Second, when my brother Dan got married in September 2000. I loved Dan's wife, Lisa's shoes! She had the cutest lacy tennis shoes. And the dancing...oh the dancing! Their wedding was laid back and very informal but fun fun fun! And we found out my other brother David had gotten engaged and Lisa was so kind to include Barb in the family wedding pictures!
no longer do i feel like anything belongs to me.
There are two more episodes on YouTube, but the third one is not so great. I highly recommend Episode 2, though. "That poor dog needs water!"
Do you think I was born in a manger?
I love this chutney.This is mom's recipe which she always make when we travel.Its great with Idli,dosa,Chappati or even rice.Great for picnic or packing lunch boxes.You can spread between two chappati and roll it out.This need a spice powder from urad dhal,fenugreek and red chilli.The spice powder made ahead and stored in fridge.
Ink: Memento Bamboo Leaves
MORAN, C. J., concurring:
It was argued that M had taken reasonable care to ensure that the renewal fee was paid, because the system in place had allowed renewal fees to be paid in time for previous years. M had thought he was being careful in renewing the patent in time, but had made a mistake that was understandable due to the form of reminder sent, which had specified different periods for each patent.
- 1/2 teaspoon of ground ginger (didnt use this at the 1st time)
However, you know what the real reason why I have to talk about state level legislation right now rather than trying to get federal same-sex legislation passed, it’s because of all the fucking leftist whiners who couldn’t be bothered to actually go and fucking vote back in 2010.
Someone decided to respond to this book. Several months ago, one of the brothers asked me: “Did you see this book?” I said: “No, what book is that?” The book was called Al-Qaradhawi, Agent of Allah or Agent of the Umayyad Dynasty? He said this was a response to my book, Lies Told about Our History. I thought it must be someone from Iran, Iraq, or Lebanon, but at the end of the book, it was written: Egypt, Al-Mansoura, phone number such-and-such, e-mail such-and-such. Al-Mansoura?! Egypt?! There is a Shiite there who has the audacity to respond to Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi?! I told my secretary to call Al-Mansoura and ask about this catastrophe. He called, and they said that one brother had become Shiite, and had begun to to back and forth between Egypt and Tehran. Brothers, I advocate closer ties between Sunnis and Shiites, and I support the resistance of Hizbullah, but under no circumstances will I allow it to serve as a reason for Shiite penetration of Sunni countries, because this will lead to civil strife and a fire that will consume everything.
Lewyckyj ( pronounced loo wit ski) someone in the lou drinking whiskey wearing skis
We also want to extend a BIG Our Creative Corner welcome this week to our Guest Designer, Jorunn Bjerkehagen. We are so excited to have you with us this week Jorunn! Be sure to stop by and visit her blog to see all of her beautiful creations.
I really hope this will be a sense of
I am not OCD,,,,,,,Noooooooooo not one little bit! You only need to look at my house, my yard, my car, my clothes to know that I am quite laid back and not one bit fussy. Mind you, I would like to be more fussy and have everything just so but personality, husband, family and so many other factors make me what I am.
God is extraordinarily patient, and his love for us is the kind that will wait billions of years. Millennia after the first attempts to figure God out were recorded in the Hebrew Bible, we haven’t succeeded yet. And that seems to be just fine with him.
Who's J#1? That'd be my handsome husband, seen here with the littles.
And thank you so much for remembering and sharing such lovely awards with me.
out Araucaria araucana
3 Ideas with legs
And for your viewing pleasure, I've even posted pictures:
Sawyer came home from school Monday and I informed him that his new vinyls had come and were up on the wall, and that his room was now done. He went upstairs to see it, came down and said... "Mom, that. room. is. AWESOME!"
shall imbibe my very soul in a lovely,
Okay, this is probably going to be a hot topic, but I couldn’t let it go. Normally I don’t write a lot about politics anymore, at least not if it’s not in context of religious thoughts. But this one I just had to relate to.
Hot temps inspire little activity. It is “Pride weekend” and yet I have done nothing about it. I feel some guilt, but the idea of waking around in bright 100 degree sunshine doesn’t sound fun. I spent Pride Saturday doing paper work and today I should watch the videos in preparing me for electronic medical records. Such reprobate living.
(1) Nature Valley =0.50 off
I am consantantly on a pursuit of being as vegan (and healthy vegan) as possible. During the week especially I eat probably 75-80% vegan. It’s hard because sometimes a subway club just is what I need to be satisfied. Or I eat out with my boyfriend on the weekend and splurge. I will never be 100% vegan. I will never say I will go the rest of my life and never eat another meat or dairy product again. Because I will. Is that healthy? No. Ive come to agree with the vegan school of thought. In my opinion dairy is not good for you. Cow’s milk is intended to make a baby calf into a 300 lb cow. Sooo…. yeah. In my opinion, meat is not good for you. It may be the only source of Vit B12, however, taking it in supplemental form is just fine and the cons far outweigh the pros in terms of meat intake. I’m not preaching, just stating my opinion. There’s research to support both sides of the argument. The only recommendation I have is to do your own research and make your own educated decisions.
-Best Bet: It would be surprising if this nomination does not happen, but it is by no means the overwhelming favorite.
To prepare for moving, it was about time to do a bit more of social networking, so, a new Facebook page was created and I also started a new blog, showcasing some of our work and behind the screens information. It is not something amazing, we are not looking to become huge, but just to show some pride in our work that we love to do.
Since the trailer already gave away a key revealing plot-point (bad trailer! bad trailer!)--well, actually it gave away the “inciting incident” that kicks off the action—so will I. “The Descendants” is about a cuckolded husband, Matt King (George Clooney). It’s ALL about that. Except his wife is in a coma when he finds out. My fellow-screenwriting buddy insists that there is no arc for Matt, but I think there is. (Writer/director Alexander Payne does not have huge arcs for his characters, much like life. They tend to budge just a little bit.) Clooney’s character must choose how he will now FEEL about his wife (he can’t DEAL with her), and how he will DEAL with her lover. It’s a story of the choices surrounding FORGIVENESS. Who will we forgive? When? How? Why?
Board of Directors, Girl Scout Council
Wow….
Next morning, I run into her teacher at school. First thing out of her mouth: "I can't BELIEVE that the OG didn't get commended performance!"
TM 12 - Water Gun
14 April 1942: Secret Field Police Staff Commissariat interrogates a civilian, who, at 1830 hours, loitered around near the motor pool. During the transport to the counterintelligence officer and to the Secret Field Police he tried to escape twice. Result of interrogation showed that he was an imbecile who could constitute a danger for the troops. He will be liquidated.
he also removed it from our midst, nailing it to the cross.
One day, when he came to, he motioned for her to come nearer.
A couple of weeks later, I received a letter from Mark's agency thanking me and letting me know that they would like to work with me in the future. Enclosed was a check for a thousand dollars from Mark Farner. He had been impressed by my attitude. I had not paid Mark and his band and crew too much more than that to come to Knoxville. Mark had probably lost money on the venture as well. But of course there were the five people who came to Christ that night.
Practical information
So I am now out of FTO. Today was my first day on the regular shift and wow was it an experience.
Ostracized from their clans Lizzy and Joseph come to depend on each other for support. He begins a campaign to protect other girls who might be in danger... but the one girl Joseph cannot protect is Lizzy, and it threatens to break him.
(2) Jenifer Simon Paul Billy Mbah
Seeing that his old comrade is desperate to return to his family, Gypo sees an opportunity. He sets up McPhillip, telling him his all is well, his parents house is safe, the police have long ago given up keeping watch. They part and immediately afterward Gypo informs the Police of McPhillip’s arrival in Dublin and his subsequent location.
Now Scott gets on top. There is some scrambling. Ettling has Marx in a head lock, and lands a knee to the body. Marx tries to take him down, Ettling reverses, and now Marx does get the take down.
Thanks, everyone, for your sweet compliments on Margaret Cottam. I really appreciate them. Unfortunately, not a whole lot of stitching has gone on here in the past couple of weeks, so I don't have much stitching progress to show you. But, I did something really self-indulgent and took the day off work on Wednesday. I got the lovely opportunity to spend the day with some friends, including Sylvia who was here from Germany! It was so good to get to spend some time with her. The four of us did a bit of shopping during the day, and then we did our Christmas gift exchange. We opted to delay it until Sylvia was here to do it in person. So fun!
VersaFine ink - Deep Lagoon
Make Your Writing - Not Your Readers - Do The Work
Even so, I have been looking enviously at the photographs of friends and other bloggers from warmer climes. My friend Talar is working for SENES in Oman, and she recently posted photos of a trip into the desert and mountains. I've worked on the other side of those same mountains, in the Emirates. Margarethe Brummermann posted photographs of her latest trip into Catalina State Park, which reminded very much of my trip to the Mojave National Preserve two years ago. Now I'm pining for desert.
Why she had to go I don't know she wouldn't say (it may have been the super spicy chicken, I don't like to ask)
Mice nibble whatever food is available, eating small portions to find what they like best. In this manner, mice destroy much more food than they eat. In a year, one mouse will produce approximately 18,000 fecal droppings. They will store food, which can lead to insect infestations. Though it is not their preference, mice will live in freezers feeding only on frozen food. This usually occurs in large commercial operations that have walk-in coolers.
I know that lots of you did...
Even if just one of these three elements is missing, we have failed to obey God the way we should. King Saul provides us with a perfect example of this in 1 Samuel 13. He was told to wait for Samuel to give a burnt offering and peace offerings to the Lord before he fought the Philistines in battle. After it had been seven days, however, and Samuel hadn’t come, Saul decided to make the offerings himself. It wasn’t that burnt offerings were displeasing to the Lord, and Saul said he made the offering to seek the favor of the Lord (v. 12), but the disobedience came with Saul acting before Samuel came to give him instruction as he was told (10:8). In response to this disobedience, Samuel says, “You have done foolishly. You have not kept the commandment of the Lord your God, with which he commanded you…. now your kingdom shall not continue” (vv. 13-14).
Blood – From any slaughtered animal. Used as adhesive in plywood, also found in cheese-making, foam rubber, intravenous feedings, and medicines. Possibly in foods such as lecithin. Alternatives: synthetics, plant sources.
“That’s what I always loved about you Carpathians: your inability to dress things up.”
If you are in need of a new Stampin' Up! catalog please let me know. They are only $8 which includes shipping.
condemnation. Despite Christ’s words.
On the eve of rivalry round in the Central Murray Football Netball League, this article covers the unique rivalry between two successful Football and Netball Clubs – Swan Hill and Tyntynder. It is a lengthy piece, but if you have time – give it a go and be educated about an epic sporting rivalry.
Let me say in a language you’re perhaps more familiar with: Howdy, y’all!
As they glided effortlessly across the marble floor leading to the ever so posh eatery, they nearly collapsed from the sexual tension mounting in each of them.
I know. I can't contain myself either.
In fact, when we do see him sweating (the novel is filled with Oscar’s abortive attempts at exercise), the transformation fails. There’s a reason “his number one hero” is “Shazam.”
The only reason her Brother and Sister became concerned and suspicious was because, having depleted her Mothers accounts to the tune of almost 1 million dollars, the gambling addict, began to borrow money from her siblings and was unable to repay it. Questions got asked, and became progressively more and more pressing until the gambling addict finally broke down and spilled the whole story.
The army says it may need another two weeks to clear the area of militants.
- Flares or battery-powered warning light
Ashtavakra said you are free the moment you think yourself free. A person is bound only as long as he thinks himself bound. Liberation can happen in one spilt second.
Needless to say, I was not expecting to see a bunny hopping around this close to my window. Also, I've literally never been this close to a bunny in my life...never. So, I promptly called my husband who luckily knows much more about rabbits than I do.
Being away from our work in Geita for 6 weeks is not ideal, but we're going to do the best we can to make our time there useful. Carson will most likely do some filming in Dar that he can't do in rural Geita. He may also spend some time on editing the footage and continuing to flesh out and develop the storyline for one of the films he is planning right now. I'll probably be pretty preoccupied with, "Is this baby ever going to come out?!" thoughts, but I'm planning to take some simple hand sewing projects along to pass the time. And of course we'll be finding ways to keep Jude entertained.
Katie is a little taken aback when Aunt Lucy tells her the truth of her potential powers but she puts them to good use in the search for the person who really killed nasty old Mavis Templeton; you just know Uncle Ben is innocent! Mavis's abrasive personality has ticked off more than just a few people in town. It takes a few sleuthing forays to finally ferret out the truth but Katie is persistent and it pays off. Of course, she has a little help from her aunt and new witchy friends.
Many years ago, it was bacon and eggs. But now it’s oatmeal, hands down.
“I want to be able to die knowing that I did something for my country, even if it’s a small part, to bring about the change I hope to see in my lifetime.”
He told them another parable. “The kingdom of heaven is like leaven that a woman took and hid in three measures of flour, till it was all leavened.”
Maybe if we all went for an Andy Murray tranny op, Father Time could be persuaded to stay away for a few years. That way, the nameless mother figure could get to spend a some time with her kids and experience the joys of a fledgling cosmos bristling with every promise of tomorrow. As for us, being stuck in limbo for a while might not be very much fun, but assuming the mantle of a grumpy Scottish stubble grower would work wonders for persuading ourselves that it really wasn’t happening to us.
I've been posting most of my Anthro photos lately directly to Flickr, so I haven't kept the blog up to date. I still get very enthused and want to rush home and "make something".
There are, I realized, two women in my school who ruptured their ACLs and who continue to train wearing braces. They're both excellent athletes; they'v had mixed success training in their condition.
Total : $195
The other gold medal that Tyson Gay won in Osaka was against Usain Bolt himself in the 200 – the last time the two have met over the distance. Now, since then much has been chronicled about how much Usain Bolt has improved in the interim – all the way to 9.58 & 19.19. But what has gone unnoticed apparently is how much Tyson Gay has improved as well. The man that beat Usain Bolt was no 9.9x 100 meter man taking a shot at the big man. He wasn’t even the 9.84 sprinter that took down Asafa Powell in Osaka. Tyson Gay is the second fastest sprinter in history at 9.69! And over the last two seasons has run – 9.68w, 9.69, 9.71, 9.75w, 9.76w, 9.77, 9.77, 9.79w, 9.79w – 9 races legal and windy under 9.80. Guess how many races under 9.80 Usain Bolt has run, windy and legal, in the same time frame – 7. So Tyson Gay has proved to have as much “leg speed” (i.e. able to run as fast) as Bolt. So Gay being able to defeat Bolt should NOT be that big a surprise. Besides, after Stockholm their record is only 2-1 in favor of Bolt (not sure where TFN is coming up with a third win). So it’s not as if Bolt has this long history of defeating Gay.
You know, I'm dreading any of my kids coming home and telling me they're Roman Catholic and are coming out of the closet - or confessional, as they call it.
So one day they are on their break during the retreat, and his Mumbai assistant pops up with
My past succumbs numbly,
Neville Lansdowne fell off the world.
Things Have Changed
My favorite image editors are Photoshop and Acorn. At $49, Acorn is one of the best software values I know. Developed by Flying Meat Software, Acorn has all of the functionality I need to edit my photos for both print and web, but is unfortunately only available for the Mac. My old version of Photoshop (CS2) is licensed for Windows. We're a mixed computer family, with both Mac and Windows, so I still use both. But I use Acorn more and more instead of Photoshop and all of the screenshots in this post will be from Acorn.
Why Not – Chain & the Gang
Valentine makes fantastic stringer when encased with CiM Sangre (covered later) - probably the most gorgeous encased stringer I have ever seen.
That night, I checked through my DVD collection to pick out the movie to take to work with me on Monday. But it wasn't there.
a spread of stars we found
kamal asked, sir it had been 7 months in my first company and my salary is very less should i ask my boss for increment please suggest???
You are an ad person, you make ads to earn a living. But we all end up with a list of brands that are non-negotiables, and sometimes your agency just doesn't have one. For example, I would not buy a PC even if Bill Gates were my special client. EVER. I would do his campaign with sheer dedication and pride, but still I would come home to my Mac, any day of the week. Why? Because some brands work for us, period, and you cannot change them.
Ok so i was going to tell you about my complicated relationship. We will name my boyfriend Hector. So Hector and i have been dating for almost 6 months. about 3 weeks ago his ex’s showed up into town. We get into a fight because he purposely took me to a bowling alley and invited his ex’s so that we can meet. I hate them, and they hate me. Why would you bring your girlfriend to meet your ex’s who want to smash her face in? It makes no sense at all. None. So i asked him if he knew where they were cause i found out they were there. He told me he didnt know why they were there and said he couldnt find them. I thought it was a little fishy but i did the girlfriend think and looked him in the eyes and asked him again. “Do you know where they are? I wont fight with them. I just want to know.” He said no, he didnt. And i believed him.
meant the time had cometh
SHORT for electronic publication, this is a universally read document that can be accessed on just about any device. Due to its wide variety of accessibility, ePubs are appealing to many and have become one of the ‘hot” topics in education.
So here i am, sleepless and pissed cause my boyfriend thinks its okay to go prancing around and being all gym crazy and social butterfly. While i sit at home being completely battered by the mere fact that i havent been told the truth these past 2 weeks. Wait i know what your thinking. You think its a double standard that i can text my ex with no issue and my boyfriend cant text his ex with no issue. You couldnt be more wrong. Let me tell you why.
Bah – I’m not going back and deleting it and and writing something else. I’ll just leave it. Tonight, at this moment, in my mind, you’re mine.
And yet, in many others – I still feel very much like a failure.
calves grow fast.
The "Champs" stamp serves as the pull tab for the journaling card.
p35 “A sacrifice, for example, not only exactly reproduces the initial sacrifice revealed by a god ab origine, at the beginning of time, it also takes place at the same primordial mythical moment; in other words, every sacrifice repeats the initial sacrifice and coincides with it.”
‘In his hazy drunkenness he feels a a wave suddenly lift his little craft. Suddenly but gently, humpback, like a careful dolphin.’
I want you to write a fanfic about Seddie using only your imagination, the iCarly videos from iCarly.com and the iCarly segments from the show.
My father died several years before my daughter's birth and I did not cry at that time. I was the steady rock that shepherded my family through the difficult situation. I told myself that because he died after suffering long from illness that it was all for the best. Somehow, at least I had the presence of mind to ask him to share some of his thoughts on life, which he hand wrote the answers to in a scrapbook I made with photos from his life. I cherish this book now even if it pains me to realize I never allowed myself to fully be present while my father was alive. He wrote his biggest regret was that his children didn't come to him for advice. My fear of disappointing him is what kept me away. Oh how I wish I had taken the chance now!
Here is the observer on his routine,
4.In chapter three Tristan is delirious with pain and fever. What images appear to him? Who are Tristan’s enemies? Why do they want to stop him?
As Osprem's Kiss sat in port, two other ships arrived at Key's Isle for the same reason. The Bird of Prey led by Captain Hammond and Lt. Tydan chose to pickup Key, figuring his punishment was enough. Unfortunately as insurance, Araxo had given recently freed Crimson Fleet pirate, Ironclaw McGrath coordinates for the same isle and told him of the wealthy noble marooned there. No one thought that McGrath would come there so swiftly. Sailing on portly Captain Yelloweye Stern's ship the Laughing Rake, the pirate crew came upon the Bird of Prey from the south. Not knowing Captain Rennaud had relinquished command, and Cpt. Hammond not knowing the Laughing Rake was only there to find Key, the two sides reacted hastily, raising their flags for battle! The Rake closed the distance while the Bird's dwarven gunner Jon Jamison targeted and tore up the pirate vessel with a few rounds of blackpowder cannon fire. As the Rake slowed and tried to return fire in hopes of boarding, they had not noticed the pair of launches sent from the Bird, coming in to counter-board their caravel! Amid a smoking, listing ship, Cpt. Stern rallied his men to repel boarders while a grim McGrath waited with still sore claw marks suffered from a vengeful harpy loosed on him days ago...
P.S. Here is a list of US patents hold by James. As I may have discussed previously, patent is a great tool to learn about things. They are very technical (an instruction set to build the thing for people knowledgeable in the field) but the patents are also required by patent laws (“BEST MODE AND PREFERRED EMBODIMENT OF THE INVENTION””) to give you a pretty good road map. Happy learning.
I think, even now in the 21st Century, there are still old-fashioned gender expectations which, sadly, get reflected in a lot of literature aimed at girls. I think it starts early with stories like Cinderella and Sleeping Beauty. What do these heroines actually do? Cinderella looks pretty in her dresses and Sleeping Beauty just lies there!
Tongkat Ali is the most potent natural herbal aphrodisiac known to man. When it merged with a number of other herbal ingredients are compatible, the result developed a powerful side-effect free, and drug-free treatment to effectively eliminate erectile dysfunction naturally.
But a funny thing happened on my way to recovery. Apparently, my Physical Therapist was a fan of the Bionic Man, because I came back better, stronger, and faster than I had ever been. Over the next few years, I really drove my times down and my distances up. It got to the point where running five, six, even 10 or 12 miles was actually enjoyable. We ran in the rain and in the sun and in the fog. We ran at daybreak and sundown. We ran on the beach and in the hills and on roads. We ran in front of the General's house and spit gritty loogies on his front lawn under the auspices of needing to clear our lungs. We ran in groups of a thousand, groups of a hundred, and groups of two or three. We chased ducks. We got chased by wild boar. In short, we ran because we could and we ran because we had to and we ran because it just felt so damned good.
The counterpoint to Carrie’s passive drift upward is, of course, Hurstwood’s passive drift downward. It may at first glance appear that Hurstwood’s ruin is owing to an overt act — stealing money from his company’s safe — but even that is a kind of drift. He can’t explain it even to himself: it’s like a stranger’s voice in his head.
The heartbreak of Ryan’s death added to his brother’s despair, but DeBow says Michael is now making slow progress. “He is able to get out of bed most mornings,” she told me. “That is a huge improvement.” Michael asked not to be interviewed: he wants to look forward, not back.
I never really expected to ever be on the other side of this, until recently. because I now have people in my little world that enjoy similar things to me and for once, the outsiders are the red cable.
Composition is such an important tool in photography. It can either make or break a photo. What if there are undesirable things captured in the photo or there are simply too much clutter? One idea to salvage a photo – crop it.
I decided on these colors based on the pretty sparkly chipboard type stuff that my wonderful Daughters picked out for me from Micheal's at Christmas time. I knew for sure that I wanted to use some dies to cut this stuff up....the colors remind of Neapolitan ice cream..LOL
available from the artist's studio
Tell Them Hatin’ (voters) One Like They In The Matrix (Keanu Reeves is a Republican?)
So she gave the completed manuscript to her agent who, while positive about the story as a whole, tactfully suggested that she might want to dial down the romance to a ‘passionate friendship’ rather than a romance.
that embodies the word ‘abandon’.
But then a friend had her book trashed on a blog review site by someone claiming to have found a huge number of editing/typographical errors. ‘I’m an editor’, the reviewer wrote, ‘if I’d been editing this, it wouldn’t have happened.’
Karen and I know firsthand how difficult the campaign trail can be particularly as governor Romney faces relentless attacks from the democrats. We have been praying for him and his family and will continue to do so in the weeks and months ahead.
Coloured with prisma pencils which I blended with mineral spirits and as it's CAS I only added a few little dew drops to embellish.
This is a widespread MYTH. This is mostly said by mothers of soon-to-be vegetarian teens, people who aren’t equipped with the proper knowledge of the vegetarian lifestyle, and even someone who might be considering going meat-free. Believe me, I used to believe this, too! It’s mentioned A LOT, and that’s why we tend to believe it. The truth is its not true. Vegetarians get the same amount of protein (if not more) as normal omnivores. It’s silly to believe otherwise. Vegetarian’s sources of protein typically are: beans, nuts (especially almonds), whole grains, peanut butter, lentils, vegetables (yes, they have protein too), protein powder, soy, tofu, quinoa, eggs, and many other foods. Protein is good for a healthy life, but people don’t think vegetarians get enough. Every morning, I have a fruit smoothie with a scoop of protein powder and two scrambled eggs. Tell me I’m not getting enough protein. Sometimes I have peanut butter and apples for lunch or another fruit smoothie, a leafy salad, or a fruit salad. Balance is key when it comes to being a vegetarian. If you eat junk, you’ll feel like junk everyday. Garbage in, garbage out. Remember to never fall for this myth. Equip yourself with reliable facts, and you can’t go wrong when it comes to being a vegetarian.
Now as far as Najib goes, we also take cognizance of all the talk in town about the amount of money being spent by him of late. People are wondering who will ever turn-off the tap that seems to be draining the rakyat’s national coffers.
When I look at this work I start craving fruit salad, how about that.
Oh, and for those of you not friends with me on FB I got blonde hair :3. Well it's not Platinum...on my skin color it looks blonde LOL.
There is never a better time of year to win a GIVE AWAY than the Holiday Season, is there? You can always use that extra gift for that special someone....or why not give yourself a gift? You deserve it!
CUTE SHOES #6: Panda Slippers
MR. JAKES: It can be, but when it's transmitted over a wire, it's not. It's something else. It's an electrical current then.
The NBC Sports Group also acquired rights to the Louis Vuitton Cup in the summer of 2013 in San Francisco, which will determine which foreign syndicate meets Oracle Racing, owned by Silicon Valley maverick Larry Ellison, for the oldest trophy in international sports.
Microsoft’s change of heart regarding the Cyber Intelligence Sharing and Protection Act (CISPA) follows the United States House of Representatives decision to pass the bill by an overwhelming margin of 248 to 168 on Thursday.
It’s the hardest thing I have ever done, embracing grief.
Most of the people who develop Trichopahagia and do not manage to break the habit quickly will end up with digestive pains, severe indigestion and in the worst cases – gastrointestinal blockages. I have come across a few stories of people who have been admitted to hospital after their body has refused to accept any food or water where they are given immediate surgery to remove a ball of hair occupying the entire space of their stomach (click here to see a picture if you are not light hearted). As Trichophagia is a result of depression and anxiety in most instances it is normally treated with anti depression medication and therapy for those people who seek help.
Have a look at the site, see what you think. (I built it myself, but using an idiot-proof template.) If you think you might fancy the course, or want to know a little more about it, come and ask. Study is done from home and in your own time.
I love your cuddles,
4. He bindeth up their wounds
This might seem like a tall order, but in many ways it has made my life easier. It reminds me, once again, that the most important thing we can give another person is our time. What does it say to a child that you went to the toy store and forked over x amount of dollars? How much more meaningful is it to that child that someone spent time really thinking about them?
Coun. Leanne Piper said that for her, the new plan is largely about “building beautifully” in the downtown. She said she’ll be applying this maxim to scrutinize the first highrise proposal – an application to build an 18-storey mixed-use condo tower at the corner of Macdonell and Woolwich streets, which comes to council for approval May 7.
Ashwagandha may be specifically very good when you are becoming tired. It really is mentioned to help your physique when you are struggling with high anxiety levels, and it could encourage a healthful sleeping pattern. In Ayurveda, it is considered to enliven the immune system and is considered to be each a rejuvenative and adaptogenic herb which may seriously help in the fight against exhaustion.
most of all, i love the big personality of this super sweet family.
But as reality and fantasy blend, and the Truth becomes a Lie, will Izzy stand and fight, or will she be swallowed by the Illusions that plague not only Heivion, but her as well?
I read that moving your wrists and fingers helps reduce nervousness this technique is used by salespeople, maybe you`ve seen some. Try to do that before something like an interview. And if you are really nervous, just keep thinking and saying to yourself what exactly is going on, what`s going to happen next.
My attempts at working out the bill were laughable. The phrase "That can't be right - can it?" was said a lot. In the end I'm 100% certain of only one thing. I owe Gina and Neil lunch and when we all meet again the first bottle of wine is on me. (OK that's two things!)
GC: I was actually watching a clip of you in the War of the Worlds show supplying the voice for the animatronic Richard Burton, and I thought that was really cool and funny that they would think to do something like that.
appy happy birthday BFF!!! Today is Suzanne’s bday and the cmc was in cahoots to do something nice for Su…well she is a nice gal and deserve all the pretty things in the world LOL. I hope you are having a sweet unforgettable time in Vegas BABY!!! LOL.
As stuff becomes their days.
I've never been really close with my own grandparents. We moved to Colorado (from Jersey) when I was 9 years old. We used to visit once or twice a year as kids (hard to do with a family of 5!) but I haven't visited in years and even then, it was brief. My father's mother visited us a few times when I was younger and my mother's father even made it to Colorado for my undergraduate college graduation but it hasn't been consistent and I hate, hate, HATE talking on the phone so we don't talk much. I send cards and pictures of Emmaline as much as I can (every 2-3 months) but that's not any foundation for a relationship and I accept that. Instead of being sad about what I don't have with my own family, I'm grateful for what I do have with Ryan's family, especially Grandma.
Kemppi manufactures arc welding equipment and is a provider of solutions for highly productive welding. Founded in 1949 by Martti Kemppi, the family run business has introduced many new innovations to the market over the past 60 years, serving industries such as shipbuilding, metal workshops and transportation. Headquartered in Lahti, Finland, Kemppi has a global presence with subsidiaries in 15 countries and customers in more than 70 countries worldwide.
And they don’t care.
Now, back to Anthony Gaughan’s talk.
Each time Finn has been admitted to the hospital for a procedure (as with his sedated echo a couple weeks ago, and more recently, a second set of tubes being put in his ears), upon admittance we are asked by a nurse a slew of questions which she checks off on a form. One of the questions is invariably, “Is he up to date on his immunizations?” My answer is always “No,” at which point I get the questioning look from the nurse who follows up with “Which ones are not up to date?” “None of them are. He’s never had any vaccines,” I answer. More quizzical looks from the nurse. “Is this by choice?” she asks. “Yes,” I say.
Destiny finds me too. But unlike Death, Destiny does not stay. Destiny comes and goes, straying to my right shoulder while Death waits by my left. They are patient and unassuming but they wait, reminding me all the time exactly how much of my fate they already know.
It’s a brilliant atmosphere with terribly wicked inspiration. I love walking along the streets with the wind and imagining stories being told all over the place with ghostly emphasis. Theres quite a few ghost stories and movies around October, it being Halloween and all. I used to love Halloween as a kid, dressing up, and such. As I got older, the dressing up aspect was always amusing, but going out for candy felt childish. It’s quite a sad thing when you feel like you’ve out grown doing something that is one of the most fun things about Halloween.
Like most of my young clients, Becky considers herself a progressive leftist. But unlike her peers, she is also angered by the Left. Becky's main gripe is street harassment -- and liberal men not having her back.
I just love ducks!! We had ducks and chickens when we were growing up. The ducks and a very mean rooster would act as guard dogs. Nothing quite like getting bit by a duck!! LOL
But Bria comes to realize she can't run forever, no matter what Rowan says. If she ever wants the courage to fall for someone worthwhile, she has to start looking back.
Jesus went into the grave. The disciples were stunned, His opponents felt the uneasiness of a hollow victory, the demons amazed, the angels in shock… an uneasy calm over all creation.
I also think it's OK to be selfish sometimes. What do I want? When do I want it? What am I going to do about getting it? Initiative starts with an I too, you know. I must take the initiative to write what I want, because I am the only person who cares whether it gets written. All the other things I'm writing right now are for the purpose of satisfying others: my professors, my parents, my fellow students, even my blog readers. If I don't write that group paper, I'm going to feel a lot of heat from my professor and the others in my group. If I don't write that zombie story or that novel or that poem -- who's going to give a flying fuck? Who but me?
Realize that death is the new life. Thanks to Jesus’ sacrificial death on the cross for you, you no longer have to live just for yourself (a goal that will ultimately destroy you through sin). But when you decide to sacrifice your own desires so that you can live the way God wants you to live, you can enjoy an abundant life that wouldn’t be possible otherwise. In this fallen world, you’ll definitely face suffering – but if you’ve died to your selfish desires, you can learn valuable lessons from the suffering you go through, which will accomplish good purposes in your life. Through death, you can experience life that includes blessings such as: contentment, sanctification, faith, love, peace, hope, becoming more like Jesus, and protection from evil.
As usual, I'm a little behind when it comes to the latest knitting trends. In this case, The Beekeeper's Quilt, by Tiny Owl Knits. Lots and lots of knitters are addicted to making these teeny little hexipuffs out of bits of leftover (or not, but I'll get to that...) sock yarn.
Hey - it's my turn to showcase another one of Janice's great images... just in time for Easter, here comes this great Easter Bundle... Just soooo adorable!
“Silence,” Mesdan says quietly. “Please.”
I don't know where I was going with this, honestly.
A former Los Angeles elementary school teacher has been arrested for felony molestation of nearly two dozen students, accused of gagging children and putting live cockroaches on some of their faces. Deputies say the crimes were committed on campus.
Have a great weekend everyone
And regardless of that, she is an absolute sweetie pie, love her to pieces! So I'm going to try to do her proud and not eff up her blog today, mmm-kay?
Instead I learned some wonderful things: that he was patient, caring, and skilled. I learned that he would rather keep the ball in play than stop to teach me a lesson about how bad I was. After all, he was trying to build our relationship, not to improve my tennis game.
8 oz UK Chocolate Malt
Examining the wrong cohort has been a big problem over the years, particularly with the psychiatric school headed up by psychiatrist Simon Wessely in England, and at CDC here in the U.S.
Suffice it to say, both the wife and our guest were pleased to see the men of the house return.
So my lay person’s impression is that if substance abuse leading to mental health problems is the minority of dual diagnosis conditions; and if substance abuse is predictive risk factor for disengagement from treatment, then addressing substance abuse problems is key to effective mental health strategies at the population level. When one then also thinks about the impact of alcohol on society … problematic.
An unarmorial age, a trough
Kanin - Orlando Bloom – Actor (Pirates of the Caribbean)
Reader Gene Fioretti alerted this blog to a Confederate Air Force Special Alert published on 20 April 2012 entitled, FiFi Under Attack from Ohio Congressman. It is about Congressman Michael Turner’s bill amendment which, if passed as currently drafted, would ground FiFi — the only flying B-29. The news alert and plea can be found here.
After admiring this piece, we can then head towards the service station at the corner where, nestling up against the Indian restaurant, there are a few stones of the north face of the curtain wall. This is the smallest consolidated piece of Hadrian’s Wall you will see, but it is far from the last. Now we must with all due caution cross the road and head uphill towards the site of Milecastle 7 (Benwell Bank). All the time the road is on the line of the ditch and the curtain wall approximates to the property boundaries fronting onto the pavement (which is roughly the line of the berm).
51But they, shaking off the dust of that place from their feet, came to Iconium.
A couple of days ago, I mentioned one of my favorite Easter traditions - the Easter Lamb Cake. This festive confection usually consists of some sort of pound cake, baked in a lamb-shaped pan, frosted with buttercream, and covered in coconut 'fleece.'
(716): the fucking easter bunny is here. he just made 3 cups in a row. no one knows who he is.
“He’s as useless as a marzipan dildo”
Named survivors: First cabin passengers —— Women, 141; men, 63; children, 6; Total, 210.
So all in all, I think that is a decent and acceptable response, if somewhat tardy.
I just finished watching a film called The Lost Boys of Sudan and I’m not really sure where to begin. I think I’m just going to make a list of thoughts I had during the film because, as much as I hate lists, there simply isn’t any other way for me to do this right now. I’ll need to give my thoughts some time to simmer before I’m capable of any other kind of response:
Initial 10/31/2009 balance: $2,360.46
They answered and said to him, “You are not from Galilee also, are you? Look and see that no prophet arises from Galilee.”
With all the losing photos, morning sickness, fatigue and all, I got way behind blogging. And now, I can't get my camera too load pics or work half the time, it's always one thing after another, isn't it? But people, I am due with my little baby girl in 3 WEEKS! And we still don't have a name for her. Hubs is stuck on one, and one day I love it and the next day it gives me a sour face just thinking about it. So... for anyone who asks about a name, I'm sure you will all be just as surprised as I will be on what it is.
Yet it seems I must go away and leave it all behind to find my future.
I’m so happy to watch and enjoy the benefits of a true aspirant of greatness achieve so much in so little time.
New Discoveries in 2008
This gets tricky. Because the author of Mark is also working with a motif in which no one other than the demons recognizes the truth about Jesus until Peter’s confession in chapter 8. This theme of the “messianic secret” is a key part of understanding the gospel – but it also means various events are likely adjusted and manipulated to fit this theme. For example, it strains credibility to believe the disciples could be so obtuse as to question how Jesus could feed the 4,000 not long after they’d seen him feed the 5,000 (8:4), but the author is using the disciples as a literary device to reveal the blindness of his own readers.
Happy New Year everyone! I only managed to write thirteen new chapters this year, which is disappointing even though I have the excuse of moving to a new country and settling into a new job. I hope to do better this coming year, perhaps even finish this new book.
invention if such a finding would entirely vitiate the limitation."). Here,
Use in recipes where you would use cream.
The beef shoulder was moist and well smoked with a great, simple flavor. The brisket was tough and fatty though. disappointing. Whereas the sauce was a good compliment to the shouder, it was a requirement for the brisket. The pork chop was excellent. It was a little drier but not quite as well smoked as those at Kreuz Market, although the meat on the other side of the ribs was deeply smoked and the best part. The rest was almost a dry pork tenderloin, but that was perfect. The ribs were amazing. Perfectly smoked and almost falling off the bone, sauce would have actually hurt them. I'd say they were almost as good as City Market. Almost. The sausage wasn't quite as dry as I like, but I'm not a sausage fan so I'm probably too quick to judge on that one. The casing was slightly crisp and the sausage tasted good, I just wish sausage didn't feel like I was chewing on fat. This was a bit porky-tasting for my taste as well, I actually prefer more spices in sausage and less on everything else.
Having grown Tom Thumb (orange) and Milkmaid (creamy white) nasturtiums last year (some of which are already creeping back again), I was very taken with the variety in the photo above called Blue Pepe; the colour combo of blue/purple/green leaves is a favourite and will be jazzed up with bright red flowers in due course. When I can, I love to grow veg that are one step removed from what's expected and these will do nicely! Entirely edible, too - I'm planning some fabulously stylish salads this year!
The last and logical question that one will naturally ask is: has the emergency resulting from the war passed or does it still exist? This is a fair and decisive question inasmuch as the existence of the emergency is, my opinion, the test and the only basis of the operation or cessation of Act 671. The existence or non-existence of the emergency resulting from the war is a question of fact. It is based on conditions obtaining among the people and in the country and perhaps even near and around it. It is highly controversial question on which people may honestly differ. There are those who in all good faith believe and claim that conditions have returned to normal; that the people have now enough to eat, sometimes even more than they had before the war; that people nowadays especially in the cities are better nourished and clothed and transported and better compensated for their labor, and that the President himself in his speeches, chats and messages had assured the public that normal times have returned, that the problem of peace and order had been solved, that the finances of the Government and the national economy are sound, and that there is an adequate food supply. It is therefore, claimed that there is no longer any emergency resulting from the war.
The woman who, like the writer of the note inserted in this post, is unable to afford the 'luxury' of a private midwife, may feel abandoned by a maternity care system that does not provide optimal care for her.
So the FIA relented and although we will commonly call this the 10% rule, the actual throttle will allowed up to 50% and some fuel can still be injected and burnt in the engine. This sounds like a climb down by the FIA and unfair to different engine manufacturers. But the unreported events at Silverstone this afternoon are fairer than the picture being painted by the teams and the media. Its true that Renault were given their greater throttle opening, but also Mercedes were given their fired-overrun, but these dispensations have been given to every engine manufacturer, so Ferrari could have more throttle opening or Cosworth could develop a fired overrun. As I understand you can one but not both of these options, so no 50%-open with a fired-overrun.
Now I need to figure out how to make some black olives. The girls love black olives. I want to make some with out sewing....so, if anyone has any ideas please let me know!
The next year I had no cake because Angus was a small babe and he had thrush which if you don't know hurts the nips like a scalding iron when he breastfeeds, so I was on an anti-candida diet which cuts all the fun and yumminess out of eating. Or I guess it was his allergies to a possibility of wheat, dairy, nuts, and soy that cut all the fun from my diet. Either way, no cake.
The Empire of Poverty is already partially in control of food supplies, medicine, electricity and all commercial activity in general. It can determine in many cases and with variations across different countries, how much of a thing can be produced, at what price it can be sold and under what authority. Its task at the present is the growing consolidation and centralization of these powers in the hands of increasingly more powerful bodies until the Empire is fully formed.
So...if you're thinking about giving your kitchen a facelift, I say do it. It's not as hard, scary or expensive as you think.
I don’t know if Mark ever became a firefighter, but I certainly never got my five minutes of fame on Top of the Pops. It’s International Firefighters Day on Friday; a chance to honor and support firefighters who risk their lives every day to help their communities and so to celebrate this we entered ‘firefighter’ into Espresso and it brought up 21 hot resources.
Visiting Elephant Sands again, for work, we found the waterhole very full of water, although not experiencing so many visits from the usual elephants due to abundant water for them elsewhere in the bush.
So Patos, take a bow – you’ve taken us to a new low and the worst part is that you didn’t need the theatrics. The motion would have failed anyway.
Mahathir’s reasons are threadbare and – what’s worse – suspect.
12. Obsolete (KEEF BAKER remix)
The Scots have yet to coalesce on a single, unifying holiday with which to express their Scottish identity as the Irish so famously have with St. Patrick's Day. Some celebrate Robert Burns' birthday in the middle of winter; some just go to the nearest Scottish or Celtic festival, whenever that is. For the religious, there's the day for the patron saint of Scotland, but that's November 30th, easily overshadowed by America's Thanksgiving.
Leather and wool are my downfall when it comes to shopping for clothes, and those are the only things I am willing to pay premium price for. I don't particularly like silk and linen, which I find really difficult to care for and while I try to buy organic cotton whenever possible, but I don't really get frustrated if I don't. I am however a little embarrass to admit that I'm rather fond of quick-drying polyester and the whole cotton/poly/tencel blend is a life-saver when traveling.
As always keep it simple and snappy! Oh and we promise to get off the soapbox for a spell.
Here is a great article by Master Gardener Steve Albert that answered every question I had about growing celery. I hope to get a celery yield this year!
Detective Nick Matheson is also starting a new job. He’s a former undercover officer who was involved in a scandal when an operation went wrong and now he finds himself in a supposedly quiet area in northern NSW where the peace is disrupted by Jo’s discovery of a body. Nick is immediately suspicious about certain things about the murder and crime scene – to him this doesn’t look like a once off. It isn’t long before they dig up some links to an unsolved murder on the Mid North Coast of NSW and some whispers of an infiltrating overseas group.
I chose my favorite book at the time, “Watership Down,” a tome of just over 400 pages that I knew like the back of my hand. The only problem was, it was really hard to compress 400 pages into those three tiny lines she gave us to answer questions like “Describe the main action of the plot” or “What is the turning point of the story?” So I squeeeeeeezed extra words into the margins and in between the lines and even onto the back. Because I HAD TO.
The thing is, orange is one of those colours that sneaks up and seduces you with its wit, charm, and humorous take on life. It's like Hugh Grant. It's a colour cad that's never around for long but it's fun when it does appear. So I suspect tangerine might take us all by surprise this year. I was watching that poignant Parisian episode of Sex and the City last night (An American Girl in Paris, Part Deux), and there was a fabulous bright orange panelled wall in one of the scenes with Aleksandr Petrovsky. It immediately made me want to repaint our summer library in a cheeky mandarin shade.
TILDA: Wonderful, just wonderful, thank you.
Where do you go - TO ROCK AND ROLL (Kenny Loggins)
So, without further ado…
He has excited domestic insurrections amongst us, and has endeavoured to bring on the inhabitants of our frontiers, the merciless Indian Savages, whose known rule of warfare, is an undistinguished destruction of all ages, sexes and conditions.In every stage of these Oppressions We have Petitioned for Redress in the most humble terms: Our repeated Petitions have been answered only by repeated injury. A Prince whose character is thus marked by every act which may define a Tyrant, is unfit to be the ruler of a free people.
Ok i bet you want to know our winners dont you lol......
The New York Giants capped of their miracle run with a Super Bowl victory. The Giants are world champs, but they still have holes in their offensive line, tight end, and linebacker cores. The Giants are planning to fill them in the upcoming draft. Here are a few players the Giants will target with the 32nd overall pick in the first round.
How’d it go: Decided to move it to Sunday to focus on my run!
glow, detergent-blue — despite the fickle pitch, we watch.
We got outside with only about 15 minutes until we had to be on the bus again, and a mad search for sakura ice cream commenced. Everyone went to the wrong stand initially, but instead of standing around and whining that they were lied to, there’s no sakura here, I actually walked around the complex and found the place. I LOVE sakura flavored ice cream. I hope everyone gets a chance to try it. As strange as it sounds, cherry blossom has a great flavor. After that, we got on the bus back to Kansai International Airport, where some shopping commenced. I hadn’t bought any souvenirs in Japan, or any foods, so I decided I was going to splurge and get some duty free stuff at the airport. I ended buying macha-sakura Kit Kat (green tea and sakura – and they were freaking delicious. Did you know that Japan has about 90%, if not more, of all the Kit Kat varieties in the world?) and some chocolate covered strawberry mochi. They disappeared pretty quickly upon my return, not even going to lie about it.
Furthermore, how does an alien species communicate with these whales across the galaxy to the point they come looking for them after not receiving any word from them for three centuries? I suppose whales not only have some sort of special way of communicated across the far reaches of space, but it makes them so much more awesome than humans, the aliens only want to talk to them.
Some bloggers have developed a plan for the month. A method of sorts to help them with topics as they undergo this 31 day challenge. A challenge it is. Sometimes it's difficult to think of a post once a week none the less to commit yourself to a daily post. Well..commit...may be the right word here.
update: a fun song from buckwheat zydeco
This has been the perfect day... I cant wait to see the pictures.
An everlasting light.
Some 9.3 million visitors spend $5.5 billion in Seattle and King County annually, contributing $440 million in state and local tax revenues. Direct visitor spending benefits hotels, retailers, restaurants, attractions, transportation services and other businesses, and supports jobs for more than 49,000 people in the Seattle region.
05. Dirty Water
I was really excited about the presents I got my nieces. Let me tell you, Christmas is way more fun when there are little kids around. They loved their presents and I actually enjoyed Christmas this year because of them.
Yesterday’s future keeps scrolling past, tinted in a monochrome palette
So is it true that you really only see me?
I spent the first couple of years making components only for myself and I decided it would be a great business plan to provide them for other Artisans to use in their work and it's been a wonderful adventure. At first I was not sure how I would feel seeing my work used by others but I love it and I've never looked back!
Welcome to Luv Scrapping Together!
Here are the cards the team have made this week to help get you thinking - there will be more to come, so do come back again to check them out.
Mama’s tears came while waiting for you here,
How's THAT for unmemorable junk?
Wifesy called me back in 7 minutes to say, “I relented and paid the moving fee.”
11. "I Don’t Wanna Die" – 1:29
I'm participating in Picture Black and White, an online photography class taught by Tracey Clark.
I know things have been a little slow around here lately, and they're going to be for a while. Along with work being super busy, I have agreed to do a play that a friend of mine is directing. She was in a pinch because someone bailed on her not even 2 weeks before Opening Night, so I have just been studying this part as much as I can. That said, I need a beer!
Yeah, it's a little small. But we also don't need tons of space. Yet, it really lacks that walkable factor that is so attractive to us.
We're told lately she's been left loose in the living room and kitchen at night. Other times she's crated. She will bark when people come into the house and we're told when crated when people are about to leave. She's only outside on a leash (they use a retractable leash). She's taken out every few hours. She rarely is walked
On another color I wrote verbs:
Turn the oven on to 'Grill' (or 'Broil', depending on your coordinates) as soon as you're through the front door.
Regardless of the unique little spot that Springsteen holds in your heart, it’s difficult to deny the extent of his incredible legacy. His is one that for all practical purposes began in the mid 1970s and is still just as relevant and powerful today as it probably was back then (okay, I’m 23, I wasn’t born yet). If Estelle is the “Fonzie of female rappers,” then Springsteen is the Derek Jeter of American songwriters — an ageless, impossibly reliable model of consistency. Please remove Jeter’s 2010 season from consideration for this analogy to work. Springsteen’s timeless value as an American songwriter and musician is paralleled by few others, and you would be remiss not to consider his name in the same realm as Cohen, Dylan, and Guthrie.
I highly recommend the green papaya salad with its little kick of pepper at the back of your throat, and the sauteed pea shoots that were just wonderful. We also enjoyed the spring rolls, both Imperial (deep fried) and fresh. The French side comes out with the duck confit or beef carpaccio, but with an Asian flair that nuances the flavors; or in dessert such as the Kaffir Lime creme brulee. You’ll find sea bass in tamarind coconut sauce, and if they offer anything in the clay pot, take it; it is always delicious. The seating is casual and the prices are reasonable ($9 to $12 for appetizers and $12 to $22 for entrees).
The increase in Daubert challenges has occurred despite the fact that the number of filings, at least in federal court, has remained consistent over the same time period. For example, using information obtained from a website maintained by the Administrative Office of the U.S. Courts which tracked a 12 month period ending March 31, the year 2001 saw 254,523 total civil cases filed in U.S. District Courts, compared to 282,307 cases filed in 2010. Although a slight increase in filings from 2001 to 2010 is noted, it is hardly in keeping with the almost 250% increase in Daubert challenges measured using roughly the same time frame. U.S. Court of Appeals filings for that same time period were also fairly stable – in 2001 there were 56,067 cases filed as compared to 56,790 in 2010.
David J (Bauhaus bassist)
How fun it is that certain things can be hinted at, if the listener can catch the subtleties. Can you think of any other words or parts of speech that change only slightly but definitely alter meaning?
Here in this interview,
Obama’s poll numbers continue to sink. This includes amongst reliably Democratic supporters such as Jews and African-Americans?
Soft cradle
The IPKat thinks this is not a very good term. For one thing, "traditional" and "non-traditional" are strange words for trade marks, since they suggest something that is handed down from generation to generation. Secondly, the words "non-traditional" do not convey sufficiently the rich vein of folly with which such marks should more appropriately be associated, particularly in areas such as smells, tastes and motion.
Slow, slow!
The notebook is written to be read by anyone else who is feeling what I am feeling at any times. The entries do not correspond to each other and their styles vary wildly – some are very formally written and go off on all sorts of tangents, or as many as is possible in two pages, while others are written in a chatty style and just explore one topic in not much detail. That’s okay, though, because they’re supposed to be like my mind, and that’s basically what my brain is like.
Vacuums
People will define pretty differently. For the purposes of this piece, I define pretty as a mutually enriching balanced combination of beauty and projected innocence.
Yesterday I attended the funeral. Marieke (as we know Marieke) had to have the last words as she spoke to us in her good bye video. Dear Marieke YOU will not be forgotten and YES I promise I will live every day to the best of my ability and enjoy! I wish your husband Lukas, your parents, brother, parents in law and other family and friends a lot of strenght. Until we meet again in your creative heaven xox
Paper: Whisper white, soft suede, pool party, calypso coral, sweet shop DSP
Here is a picture story of putting bees into a hive:
I am delighted to agree with this conclusion, which answers my previous criticisms about the Biston story. But we have to remember that the evidence for natural selection never rested entirely—or even substantially—on the bird predation experiments, but rather on the datasets documenting allele frequency changes that were consistent, parallel on two continents, and then reversed when the environment changed. What was important about the bird-predation experiments (especially the one discussed here) is that they identified the agent of selection.
In Texas, the review of Benjamin Herbert Boyle’s case got underway only after the defendant was executed, 16 months after the task force was formed, despite pledges to prioritize death penalty cases.
Similarly, it will take a concerted effort people making tough choices to: slow down; use turn signals correctly; yield the right of way courteously; hang up the phone; and drive in a focused, self-disciplined manner to further reduce collisions and their associated costs.
Now you want to figure out what kind of pattern you want to make. My husband and I decided not to have a pattern. Except that no two colors would be side by side.
Daughter: Amy Wells
I'm also in the process of researching a juicer. They are either super pricey or they've got bad reviews. Yikes.
Percvial (1) states that the Canterbury Whitebine, Farnham Whitebine and Mathon Whitebine are so closely related in botanical character that the cannot be distinguished form one another and are, no doubt, one and the same variety. The Farnham White Bine was originally selected from a cutting by Peckham Williams around 1750 as I have detailed earlier. Though it has long been sold as a Golding variety this plant pre-dates Mr Golding’s famous selection as it is, in fact, the parent plant he took his renowned cutting from.
Onto our HUGE news that we received on Friday. Our PTC (parent teacher club) recently decided that they would be purchasing 4 Smart Boards for classrooms in our school. Rather than pick recipients randomly, anyone interested submitted a little "application" of why you wanted one, and what you would do with it. The big news... BOTH of us were chosen to get Smart Boards, something we've been seriously coveting, and pushing for. They will be purchased this spring, and we be installed this summer. Yayyyyy!! We are beyond excited for the new challenge of using this tool in our classrooms. Our district has also adopted new reading and math curriculum, both from McGraw-Hill and both with INCREDIBLE websites. We can't wait to dig right in! So, that's where you come in. We'd love any tips or advice about our Smart Boards, or anything that might help us out. So, leave us a comment with anything we need or should know, and we will pick 3 lucky winners to pick anything from our TpT Store. So don't forget to leave your comment by Saturday at 8:00pm pst, and we will announce the winners on Sunday. Have a great week!
Applications for the Bloomington Arts Commission are now being accepted. Application review will begin May 7th and will continue until the position is filled. Applications, information and a complete list of Board and Commission descriptions are available at www.bloomington.in.gov/clerk and at the City Clerk’s Office in Showers City Hall at 401 N. Morton. For more information or questions, please contact the City Clerk’s Office at 349-3408.
* Going to see the Red Sox with my father on Sunday. Looking forward to a day at Fenway with the old man. Here’s hoping they win!
As though in heaven there was revolt and riot,
BBC’s Sherlock with Benedict Cumberbatch is not good for me. But unfortunately my mind is not strong enough to resist it.
Track and Field Thursday after school in the gym until 4 p.m.
And then he goes on and talks about how this girl he knows is ugly and has no friends and I found myself thinking, ‘is this the same guy that was calling the other kid a d-bag? Really?’ It just wouldn’t leave my head so I asked other guy friends of mine and one of them almost made me cry.
Blue screen, that is. The kind they use in movie making when they film actors against a blank blue screen and then Cg in the background. During a blue-screen shoot, the cameras capture the characters delivering their dialogue and action, but they don’t capture the setting. There is none. It’s just blue nothingness.
I used the new Sweet Spooks set for this cute little spider--there's even a little web line stamp for him to hang from! I stamped him on some A*muse Sleepy Hallow paper and paper pieced him with some Smokey Shadow. The orange paper is Echo Park. Aren't you in love with that fun Halloween-y but not scary font?
In the Doctor Who Annual 1966 (The Monsters from Earth) we learn that in their early history, the Sensorites worshipped the Zilgans who lived in the darkness of the caves. The Zilgans were spider-like creatures, larger than the average grown man. The Sensorites would feed the Zilgans their criminals as punishment. At this time in their history they did not wear clothing as they did in the serial.
What did Paul know about sailing? Those men in charge of that vessel were master seamen. They had the history of the sea at their disposal. They had the knowledge of man to draw upon. Ah yes, but Paul had the Word of God; and it was God who made that sea and also had control over the weather. Don’t you think the Creator has more authority over such matters than the creature?
New entries only please - do not backlink to older posts.
Mispronunciations aside (and it’s ree-nuh, in case you were starting to wonder), I grew up very under-appreciative of my name. My name didn’t fit right, but I was a teenager, nothing about me fit right. My sister always tried to shorten it (to reen, yeah, that’s appealing, but if my mother can put up with being called Die instead of Diana, I guess I can muster on under the burden of reen), and my friends tried to hide behind clever nick names: Kit (didn’t catch on), elffy (oh boy, internet inappropriate story there), and of course Sasquatch because I have enormous feet. Nothing stuck. Never did they find a name that worked. To this day I’m not sure if I was relieved or disappointed.
Except, there was more than one war; and which one you were following depended on where you lived.
Caller: He’s putting pressure on me, and threatening to divorce me. I don’t have anybody. I haven’t seen the world. He’s the only man I’ve known.
Editor: It really is a shame. I just... I had really high hopes for this book, but I'm not sure I can get the author to really get it up to 100% of what it could be. I can take the time to do another round of edits, but then we might miss our to-production date.
to feel complete in life
Usually it is competitors who bring the complaints.
As up with the tweets.
This probably emerges from my history of having some of the worst spring breaks of all time. Last year I stayed home sick and my whole family went to Vegas without me. Party on.
All Aboard: A Tribute to Johnny Cash (Cry! Cry! Cry!), Anchorless Records (2008)
Why do I like them? Because were authentic I suppose. There's nothing that I can add to that, you either understand what I mean or you don't.
The bowler hat is back, it's been too long since I last wore it! Literally have nothing to write about, I've had a pretty bland day today. Watched The Artist though, to see what the hype was all about - I quite liked it actually!
“Eighty guineas per visit,” replied the Doctor……((for it was in The Victorian days of yore))
“An Education' is one of the best films released in a long while with superb actors, script and the power to make you question and change your views about education.
And, while You are at it, help Obama win tomorrow so we can start to take
He characteristically depicts in all of his art—photographs, paintings,
Chandler’s family has been fighting for 37 years for this execution, waiting while Selsor had years of appeals and a second trial. Now that clemency has been denied, they’re finally allowed to tell their story.
Ambiguous undulations as they sink,
2-05 Brian Eno & J. Peter Schwalm - The Milky Way 2:33
Jamil Nasir - The Allah Stairs ***: A very good dark fantasy about a boy who escapes into a magical realm to get revenge on an abusive father. Has the feel of Victorian weird fiction, where two guys are walking down the street and they spot something weird that they don't fully comprehend.
May 3, 2012 NOTE: Bank closings are so numerous in the past three years that this post spans several pages. Be sure to click on the “MORE” link at the bottom of each page. I want you to get the full flavor of just how serious this problem is in the USA, while the press worries about what the Kardoucheans are doing daily. Also, bear in mind that the FDIC insures the deposits in these seized banks, and depositors over the FDIC limit are shit out of luck. But do you not have to ask yourself exactly where the FDIC is getting all this money to cover these losses?
Acts under "color of any law" include acts not only done by federal, state, or local officials within the bounds or limits of their lawful authority, but also acts done without and beyond the bounds of their lawful authority; provided that, in order for unlawful acts of any official to be done under "color of any law," the unlawful acts must be done while such official is purporting or pretending to act in the performance of his/her official duties. This definition includes, in addition to law enforcement officials, individuals such as Mayors, Council persons, Judges, Nursing Home Proprietors, Security Guards, etc., persons who are bound by laws, statutes ordinances, or customs.
A lot of caricature artists, especially white ones, shy away from caricaturing common, objective features African American features like large white noses, and big lips, for fear of being perceived as "racist" This is ridiculous. It's like accusing an artist as being anti Senatir because he draws a Jewish an with a big nise...who happens to objectivey have one.
And flamed upon the brazen greaves
The famous songwriter Tony Lane, whom I’ve had the pleasure to meet last year, said it best when he said, “Don’t tell, show”.
"I-70 west toward the mountains."
The map shows the area (ward not exact address due to confidentiality) where a problem has been reported. These are colour coded by type such as shortfall, overcrowding or arrears. You can the click on an entry for more details.
* University of Washington - Seattle (USA)
5. Take your favorite book, photo album, etc. Wreck it.
Black Adidas pants with red stripes and red t-shirt, bare feet.
Like wine, oysters have their appellations, and bivalves from different regions will display different taste profiles. In addition to the different characteristics of the five species generally available to oyster bars in North America, the intricacies of an oyster’s flavour reflect the waters in which they are grown — merroir instead of terroir, if you will. The same species of oyster, for example the Crassostrea virginica or Atlantic oyster, will taste different depending on the balance of fresh and salt water in its region.
This color combination is my favorite, of course, and cheered me a bit on another rainy and dark day. I have been trying (!) to do some cleaning in my craft room, and it's really hard to see much. How's that for an excuse?
However, reports of further rooms begin circulating, literally as early as the comments thread on the interview. People simply do not believe that the project is over. There's an eleventh room, some say, in a Seattle hospital – and they've got photographs to prove it. There's a twelfth room in Morocco; a well-known journalist claims to have been there just last week.
Detangling Tools
In a large skillet or pot, heat Earth Balance and olive oil and add garlic & sausage. Cook, stirring occasionally over medium-low heat until sausage has browned. Add pea tendrils and broth, salt & pepper. When pea tendrils have wilted, add white wine. Cook for a couple more minutes, adding more broth or pasta cooking water if necessary so the sauce isn't dry. Toss with cooked pasta.
Practitioners of Chinese medicine utilize a wide variety of herbs as well as acupuncture and ear acupuncture to treat itching based upon the cause. The medicine Xiao Feng Zhi Yang Chong Ji (Eliminate Wind and Relieve Itching Infusion) can be taken three times daily to relieve itching.
23. Thread the ribbon. Begin with one end and thread it through each piece.
Send entries to:
But if you rather want Marxist propaganda or regurgitated drivel – go and Google “Kill all Whitey” or “Shut-up Whitey” or whatever some thug hoodlum is calling his tripe nowadays. There you’ll find 101 reasons why killing a farmer is a good thing. Or not so bad. Or not as bad as somebody says.
I get life stories. Mothers who’ve miscarried. Siblings who’ve lost their sister to a long illness. Grandpas who just got up (at 11 am) and aren’t “really with it yet”. Proud parents forward me press releases for their successful children’s hometown concert. Homeschool moms discuss curriculum choices. I am just a salesman and a violinist! I try to be sympathetic, but such things catch me off guard.
But wait: actual people are "ethical" on a formal, logical sort of level (respecting others' rights through applying the logic of universality) and "ethical" on a situational, emotional sort of level (minimizing felt harm through the capacity for empathy) and they appreciate "good" people who they estimate to be salutary examples of a well-realized person (a “gentleman of Athens”). In fact real ethical people (that is, people when they're actually trying to act ethically rather than merely trying to do ethical theory) use Kantian-style "golden rule" reasoning and Millian outcomes-oriented strategies and they make Aristotelean evaluations of themselves and others all at the same time. “Ethics" turns out to be a heterogeneous concept: the intentions of rational beings, the qualitative experiences of conscious beings and the health or pathology of living beings are all different things, such that there turn out to be not so much differences of opinion among "ethical theorists" as there are changings of the subject. Confusion (and sound and fury) is generated by a presumption that ethical thinking must be one kind of thinking and so there must be one “theory” that gives an account of it. The misleading grammar in this case is the use of a singular abstract noun “ethics,” which creates the strong impression that there is only one topic when in fact there are several that come under that rubric.
There’d be a chance that we could save the show
What I can say though is that I have a new personal best for distance covered in one day; 232kms.
-paint entire wall next to refrigerator with chalkboard paint.
Al Hey
It was one of those decadent, three-figure meals I'd normally only indulge in for anniversaries and birthdays ending in zero. For a freelance music writer whose percs are typically confined to promo CDs, guest list spots, free beer and the occasional thanks-but-no-thanks herbal offering, this was a rare treat.
In the love we made
but they hold this ship together tossed like leaves in this weather
Hopefully I'll have something REALLY interesting to tell you all about!
I liked the book very much, and enjoyed reading it, but didn't quite love it...and I've had to give considerable thought as to why. My reasons are all very personal, and don't count as measured critical thoughts about the book, but for what it's worth, here they are.
Place the whole block of tofu directly into a steamer or onto a slightly curved bowl. Fill the bottom of a large saucepan with a few inches of water and place the steamer or dish into it and cover. Bring the water to a boil over high heat and steam for 15-20 minutes. Resist the urge to remove the lid to check on it.
Soon my birthday came and although we couldn’t leave for Florence yet, L made my day special. He took me to a wonderful pizzeria called Vecchios. Now, I love pizza but this was unlike any pizza I had ever tasted. It was heaven in my mouth. That fated day is the cause of my American Pizza Dissatisfaction. Ever since chowing down on that delicious masterpiece of brickoven fired round perfection I have yet to eat its equal. In fact, no pizza has even came close to satisfying me since. It’s so unfortunate… We ended the evening by enjoying the most unique gelato I had ever had. Everything on the menu had a theme. My gelato came out resembling Pinocchio with a cone being placed as his nose. L’s was centered around the chocolate covered mint ‘After Eight’ and resembled the night sky. It was a perfect birthday and unforgettable. I spent it in Italy with the man I loved.
Of course there are many other definitions and meanings of genocide, but in the end, when analysed in depth, they all add up to the definition provided by Chalk and Jonassohn, which states: "Genocide is a form of one-sided mass killing in which a state or other authority intends to destroy a group so defined by the perpetrator.” (Frank Chalk, Kurt Jonassohn The History and Sociology of Genocide: Analyses and Case Studies, Yale University Press, 1990, ISBN 0-300-04446-1)
There are lots of rumours going around about who might put their name forward at this year's election, but we will all have to wait and see who is officially confirmed by the electoral officer. Doug Cuthand, a columnist for the Star Phoenix talks about a couple of these potential candidates:
Dear I Don't Know,
Morgen: Most people do write under their own names and I don’t think it really matters one way or the other. Ruth Rendell writes as Barbara Vine and Joanna Trollope as Caroline Harvey (to name two) but that’s because they’re writing different genres. Do you have an agent? Do you think they’re vital to an author’s success?
1.) Man in the Mirror Ministries with Pat Morley – Morley and company are the premier thinkers in the world of ministering to men. Their website is super user-friendly. You can read countless articles on men’s ministry, men’s issues, etc. You can download and listen to men’s Bible studies taught by Morley or watch them online. You can also sign up for a number of training events that Man in the Mirror holds or purchase some fantastic resources online. Great website that goes well with an incredible ministry to men.
This cheese has roots dating back to the 15th century. Sao Jorges is made from unpasteurized cows milk. It is aged 3 to 5 months. It is more yellow than white.
** I enjoyed it enough that I went and bought a paper copy. That’s how I roll. Having a public domain copy on your kindle just doesn’t feel REAL. It’s like you dreamed you read it.
Here you’re getting a peek at our new lip scrub. Imagine the deep moisture of cocoa butter and vitamin rich shea butter, antioxidants from olive oil and vitamin E, the gentle exfoliating power of sweet brown sugar and a surprise ingredient or two for loving those smoochers into their full kissing potential.
In a mothers tears in the dead of night
My blog has seen little love lately, so I thought I'd share some links to posts that have been inspiring and interesting to me. I've been so busy with Christmas projects that I have very little time to write on my blog. Of course, I want to share what I am working on, but then the surprises might be blown (especially since my girls read my blog sometimes).
After grabbing a hot chocolate from a nearby cafe, we decided to visit the Eiffel Tower again. Unfortunately we could not get to the summit of the tower as repair works were being carried out on the lifts but the views from the second floor was just as amazing! After the Eiffel Tower we headed back to Saint Paul's for lunch and some shopping. We found some amazing vintage shops and boutiques, as well as having Fallafel for lunch! We later headed to St Paul's where we found the best vintage, homeware, kitchenware and random shops in Paris, as well as seeing Notre Dame cathedral.
Another thing I love about this recipe is that the cream is not cream, but creme fraiche. Makes me feel so virtuous. I took this recipe from BBC good food and edited the proportions somewhat.
You arrive at a dinner party of an old college friend or a colleague from work. Your host greets you and your zombie date graciously at the door. She invites you in, and as she takes your coat, she runs through the basics: hors d’oeuvre on the coffee tables, drinks in the kitchen, zombies in the corner by the ficus. You look up and sure enough, six zombies are herded into the far corner of the living room behind a tall plant.
“Every bomb that is dropped, every bullet that is fired in the name of this war of terror has to be made somewhere. And wherever that is, it can be resisted.”
You’d need your phone turned on to use NFC for pairing devices, or if you have a wallet application that needs to be running to make a payment, but presumably this means that if you’ve set it up in advance, your BlackBerry could still unlock the office door or let you use it like a credit card if you battery runs down.
I guess it would be relatively straightforward to show that under most circumstances, the activist is qualitatively better for the polity and the society. But are there any circumstances when the activist is the ‘wrong’ choice?
From the website ‘The National Assembly for Wales’s Finance Committee has opened a public consultation on a new inquiry examining aspects of financing and finding of devolution.
Under the amended law “highly trained” permit holders would be able to carry in the gun-free zones – which would require extra hours of training and more rounds fired at the range beyond the current basic requirements.The bill, SB 59 has been recommended for passage in the Senate and would allow a permit holder, with additional training beyond the base level required under the standard permit, to carry within the now prohibited areas. The bill also does several other things, including ending the concealed weapon licensing boards and transferring the issuance of CPLs to the Secretary of State and many other improvements, as well as slightly toughen the standard training standards by requiring more rounds to be shot. The proposed standard increases the number of rounds from 30 to 98. This increase is no problem as the standard course of fire in the standard NRA training program is coincidentally enough in the area of 98 rounds. Since I stick to the curriculum when I teach, each student shoots at least that much, and more if they're having any issues.
On the morning of May 4th, Leeteuk tweeted, “The sun rose while I was tossing and turning because I couldn’t fall asleep. But I could hear a good song coming from outside and thought, ‘What is that?’ and searched on a music site for a long time… it was IU’s new song. ‘Peach‘… a refreshing song.”
I'm not really sure.....
Take aways
Today we have a primer talk. What is confusing to you I imagine is that you have not quite understood what takes place when you have a new thought, a sun-thought, in the galaxy which makes your identity, especially such powerful ones as you have been given. You do not take, as it were, a new concept in your hands, place it in the midst of the familiar galaxy and expect a sudden radiance, an immediate change, although I do not forget that instant revelation and realization have come to some of the great ones who have walked this way. No, like all good things this work begins humbly. It is like planting a seed that grows and grows for a time in the dark. Ideas that have been given to you in these communions are in movement and as they grow larger and larger they push out into oblivion the older ideas which were foolish and out of proportion. This is difficult to put into words, but it may help you not to be too introspective.
So, anyway, you probably know that there are two bosses: Scarlion and Targa. There are 3 phases to each and they have different stats from GMS, obviously:
We've had a very busy week. Lots of meetings about the boys. They have all been very positive. Unfortunately, some of the information we have received has not. It appears that Samuel's formal assessment won't be done until the fall. This is quite frustrating, but our pediatrician has prepared a letter that should enable us to obtain some assistance for Sam until he starts preschool in the fall. As I write that, I can't even imagine my little bruiser is old enough to go to preschool. It seems just like yesterday that he was born. He always seems so young to me that I forget that he's 3 now. The wait for the assessment is worth it as we will have some answers by this fall, way before his 4th birthday. That is better than we had with Thomas, who was diagnosed two weeks before his 5th birthday.
Magnifique 4500306
Then I did something no one has ever asked me to do before: I swept dirt and pebbles. Only for you, Bestie!
Folks are always looking for a goat. Why not Brady? Welker is an easier target.
Between admiring the gems, sipping complimentary champagne, and nibbling caviar hors d’oeuvres, we were offered lipstick applications by Lancôme makeup artists who chose colors for us. Lancôme has divided the colors into three categories: Jolis Matins (M) for classic daytime wear, Boudoir Time (B) for trendier looks, and Tonight is My Night (N) for glamorous evenings out.
Did I mention how much L loved it? She was rubbing the cotton balls on her face saying “Den telllle” (Gentle for those of you that don’t speak toddler.) Eventually they were all over the floor and she was rolling in them.
I wish those members staying on and the new DT members all the best and can't wait to be inspired by their Purple Pumpkin creations.
It so happens that I do. Barry is sitting opposite me and, bless him, has started shifting uncomfortably in his seat. Barry is the very definition of a decent skin and is happily settled with a lovely young lady, so I really don't have an issue with my wife having kissed him on a night out many moons before we even met. We don't talk about exes much but she had told me about Barry, perhaps to help me avoid an awkward situation such as the one Kevin has just tried to engineer.
EVERY GIRL IN A RELATIONSHIP IS SOME SORT OF A RESEARCHER
The aboriginal car you’ll physique is about a Jet Ski. Afore you can go anywhere, you’ll accept to in actuality draw your advance appliance the stylus. With your advance plotted, you’ll yield ascendancy of the Jet Ski, which you can move angular with the stylus and is apparent from a behind-the-back perspective. Admitting your advance is fixed, there are still obstacles and enemies that you accept to contrivance and rings to collect. You can tap on the awning to boost, and there are ramps that you accept to achieve tricks off of by authoritative a specific action with the stylus. Eventually you’ll acquisition that the aqua bang doesn’t accept abundant range, at which point you’ll accept to physique your next vessel. There are four altered cars in total, anniversary with its own ascendancy schemes and its own altered abilities that achieve it best ill-fitted for specific routes. The hovercraft is a lot of agnate to the Jet Ski, admitting with a added focus on abhorrent abilities. In the case of the barge and the submarine, you don’t in actuality ascendancy the abode at all, instead annoying abandoned about battlefront weapons at admission enemies. These traveling sequences are adapted little interludes amid the accustomed levels, admitting they’re never any bigger than the antecedent Jet Ski.
I followed Chris Schwarz' model for handsawing big timber to length.
Two things struck me this week as I listened to Republicans, Democrats, and Independents conversing (loudly) about what Rosen meant, or didn’t mean, and whether there’s any truth to whatever she meant, or didn’t.
Wow. We're down to the last three a-z posts and I sure hope you're all doing better than me. I haven't made it around to nearly as many peeps as I wanted even though I wrote nearly ALL my posts in advance. It was hard responding to everyone's comments, checking out the participants, AND keeping in touch with all the regular blogs I follow! As of today I'll have made it round to 214 blogs on the list, which isn't too bad but I was really hoping to do better. If I haven't made it to yours my apologies.
Day 5: April 27, 2012. Something A Bit Different It’s back, and this time it has the most amazing of prizes (look for the prize for ‘most creative post’). This was a massive success last year, and for many it was the highlight of the Blog Week, so this year you are challenged, again, to find a new way of blogging. This is an experimental blogging day to try and push your creativity in blogging to the same level that you perhaps push your creativity in the items you create.There are no rules of a topic to blog about but this post should look at a different way to present content on your blog.
The young man than kneels down, and takes the stolen gold from the fallen Knight.
Guess we'll see.
Does a person of benevolence never worry? Again, she may worry that her efforts to help a situation are not enough, and will act anyway. I think of my sister Christina Stewart in this regard. She and her husband are leaders of a global Christian charity called Impact Nations, delivering acts of service in many developing countries around the world, from Haiti to India. One who does not share their faith may disagree with the evangelical aspects of their ministry, but there is no questioning the positive effects they are having on the material conditions of the people they serve. I’m sure, for Christina, sometimes their efforts must feel like a drop in the bucket, and she must worry that they aren’t doing enough, but here she has her faith to sustain her, and she knows that it is better to act in spite of her worry and doubt, than not to help those they can reach. And always, she strives to do a little bit more.
I'd never really thought this way before but I saw the light on the Newbury Bypass!
Za 2-way Powder Foundation both in Colour 21(Shown in first picture.)
I am so happy I was there to be in that moment it was so much fun!
07.Through A Venomous Carnage (03:27)
COMPONENTS:
I will be in touch shortly!
Anyway, when I went to feed the boys, Gilly came into the barn while I was getting their oats. I feed them outside so he turned and went back out and to the feeder by the gate. When I came back to the barn to fill up the water bucket and get hay, here is what I saw laying on the barn floor.
We sure love you!
Angry Aeroplanes – The Millipede Engine (chosen by Piley)
Once I got beyond that I decided I would check out the New York Literary Agency, and let me tell you that with just a little research into what makes a reputable agency, that site alone should have you running. Why? Well, here are just a few of the things I see wrong with it. Nowhere is there a list of clients, books, or sales. Instead they seem busy touting the types of manuscripts they receive and how they will market your book. They are located in NYC, where they meet with “buyers.” Buyers? What does that mean? The only people I know who meet with buyers are sales reps from the publishing houses. What about editors? You know. The people who buy the books from agents. Oh, and I could go on and on. Take a moment to look at their diverse list of clients. Doctors and lawyers! Whoo-hoo.
The book does highlight some interesting issues that will make your peepers pop & kick your brain cells into gear, so yes, in a sense, I am more aware of certain things, would like to try out healthier options, try switch up certain bad eating habits with good ones, but honestly, it didn’t change my life, I didn’t convert to anything overnight. The Power that got me curious to read the book wasn’t powerful over me. I’m not sure if that disappoints me or if it pleases me to generally know better than to have a book convert me as soon as I read the last page.
170g plain flour
As promised here is part 2 of our Grand Canyon hike – the walk out.
"Well this one's not quite round, and the rim's uneven. Can I have it at half-price?"
I’m living while awake.
Great set up! That line immediately draws in your reader (says a reader, LOL.) What’s your favorite line in the book?
So the laptop was right there and as she seemed focused on her current game, I started googling. Lots of 'cry it out' stuff came up, which I wasn't interested in of course. Then somehow I landed on a page mentioning aware parenting and I followed it just because it sounded like something I would be interested in and lo and behold, there was a whole thing about crying!
Not that there is anything wrong with the original in any way, shape or form!!
Moda provides a coat immediately, along with browsing, browsing, browsing (Did I wash off the eyebrow?), browsing (Yes.), browsing. LUNCH! Dukbokki, mandu, something else? I'm sure there was, WHY oh why didn't I eat before??? SHOPPING CENTERRRRRRRRRRRRR. I am a zombie, and poor company, I'm sure. Worn out from the day, we get coffee. Myeong Hee and I walk back to the subway. Ahhh, yes, Moda Outlet, you've done it again. Two satisfied shoppers.
This can be a touchy subject and please read (and believe) my words - I know there are families/children in the Dallas area that are in desperate need of this kind of help. Walmart is providing a huge service to those families, and in turn to DISD so the school system (i.e. taxpayers) doesn't have to foot the bill. In theory it's a win-win, the private sector helping the public sector. What I have a problem with are parents taking advantage of the system and getting free lunches for their children when they have no need (breakfast has now been taken off the table for this discussion since Walmart's backing that in our city). It all comes down to priorities.
But, hey! That's what a lazy Saturday is all about. I think I'll round out my self-centered/ lazy day eating a cookie of myself and painting my toenails! Good day to you sir!
I’ve thought about it a lot, and I’ve decided, as good as it sounds, it’s not for me.
Pepe, who played a blinder, brought down Gomez inside the box and Robin beat Ike Cassillas to level the aggregate 3-3 in the 26th minute. Madrid started piling up pressure and creating more chances with Benzema and Ronaldo.
Making someone into an idol or the constant center of attention can bring undue pressure on people and make them vulnerable to negative behavior. Over the years, I have seen many kids turn to substance use because they didn’t make the all-star team or came in second in a competition or couldn’t maintain a 4.0 GPA after transitioning to college. It’s important for kids to achieve balance in their lives. They should be the best they can be, and not put pressure on themselves to surpass their latest accomplishment. Encourage them to work to please only themselves.
Please use this website to access any of our class material. You will be able to view content of most of the Core Subjects we learn in Year 5. I will be updating content regularly.
Who is the British Guild of Beer Writers, Writer of the Year?
Having acknowledged the need for rest, and without laying guilt at the door of anyone who stayed home last Sunday, I still found our low attendance ironic, if understandable. It was ironic because it was Easter 2. Easter Sunday, of course, is the climax of the church year, but it is by no means the dénouement. The whole point of the entire rest of the church year is that we Christians live post-Easter. We are a resurrected people.
It is fair to say that Sorensen was responsible for much of the brilliance of JFK's set-piece speeches. The 1961 inaugural address included this sentence, which, in historical context, crystallized the attitude of JFK as a Cold Warrior: Let every nation know, whether it wishes us well or ill, that we shall pay any price, bear any burden, meet any hardship, support any friend, oppose any foe, in order to assure the survival and the success of liberty.Of course, JFK was a remarkable extemporaneous speaker, as the old films of his press conferences demonstrate, so Sorensen and Kennedy were an excellent team.
NOTE: this is “the secret” to manifesting what you want. It has to come from the highest place of love, peace, and non-attachment. Many people long for things, but are afraid to not have them, so the vibration of fear pulls in more things for them to be afraid of. What we get, our “reality,” is always a direct match with who we are being. When I am interested and yet not attached to having new clients, they show up on their own. When I am worried about money and feeling frustrated, nothing I do seems to work.
I also learnt that I wasn't much of an actor myself. Years later, as a beginner-writer, I came across the bizarre suggestion that you should "cut all adverbs". This is the bastard, tyrannical offspring off a good regime: fiction is built of character-in-action, so keep looking for the perfect verb for that action and don't settle for a bland one spiced up with an adverb. At which point, I had... well, I was going to say a lightbulb moment, but it was more of an olive-oil-and-wick-lamp moment, which sent me back to my undergraduate copy of Aristotle's Poetics:
Once more, thank you for sharing your thoughts. Please do not hesitate to contact me if I can be of assistance in the future. I look forward to hearing from you again.
when we packed up our little apartment in Auburn
However, I really enjoy spending time with kids, not just mine.
c) June
1 massive
Leo Lyons F 6’9″ 225 Missouri
Once the entire chocolate has melted, stir gently to mix it all in and get a smooth and silky texture.
How can a media buyer save your business advertising dollars? We get asked this a lot. So we decided to give you a simple explanation as to what we do and how we can help your business invest their advertising dollars more effectively.
And hope to feel the softness
Word of the bubbling ocean up north got briefly into the media, and provoked a fascinating response. The New York Times, for example, published a story that mentioned the reports,and then insisted in strident terms that reputable scientists had proven that the methane plumes were perfectly normal, part of the Arctic Ocean’s slow response to the warming that followed the end of the last ice age. This same “nothing to see here, move along” attitude duly appeared elsewhere in the media. What makes this fascinating is that the New York Times, not that many years earlier, carried bucketloads of stories about the threat of climate change, including stories that warned about the risk that the thawing out of the Arctic might release plumes of methane into the atmosphere.
“Are you drunk?”
As with The Woman Before Me, Cate is the weak link. This is what I had to say about her last appearance:
e) In the margin of my Bible it says that this means “a revealer of secrets” or “the man to who secrets are revealed.”
‘Yes, I have it here. It represents the game itself.’
I was teaching a Sunday school lesson about how we cannot earn God’s love with good deeds or being “good” people. After I taught what the curriculum said, I felt Jesus telling me to ask the kids the “big” question. So I asked, “If we can’t earn God’s love with deeds — and He will love us no matter what we do — then why do we give food and clothes to homeless people, donate money to orphanages, be kind to mean people, obey and respect our parents, never lie, and do everything else the Bible says to do? If God will love us even if we don’t do those things, why should we do them?” I had no idea how to answer that question myself, really. Then, a little second grade girl raised her hand confidently. I pointed to her. She sat up with big brown eyes and said in a matter-of-fact tone, “Because we want to love Him back.”
Fly high little one
One good reason might be the admission charge (almost as much as for the Tower of London and rather more than for the royal yacht Britannia), and another, the fact that it isn't that spectacular in itself, nor is the story it tells that unfamiliar. But I donned the compulsory plastic overshoes and wandered through its main state-rooms.
Is it weird to say that writing this blog has made me a happier person? If so, maybe I’m weird, because it has helped me so much. I said it before, but it’s worth repeating. I am happier when I write here. I am thrilled by the comments, and the e-mails, and the random messages from people who love the things I say. I feel like I’m not such a louse.
You have three choices of meal rations for you and your family (more on them soon). There is Filling, Meager, and Bare Bones. Meager seems like the rational choice as you know that sacrifice must be made to get to the glorious land of Oregon. This is not a Four Seasons Trail. You are the head of this expedition and your choices now determine the outcome of this dangerous but rewarding journey. So this is what you should do.
Sandra is one who found the right arena for her fight.
However, the terms that Frey lays out for authors are atrocious and exploitative—a pittance of a fee ($250!), vaguely defined profit sharing, no copyright, no public acknowledgment of authorship, and so on. And the model of success that Frey sells authors on, his young adult novel I Am Number Four, turns out to be not much of a success at all for his co-author. (Full disclosure—as an editor, I passed on I Am Number Four, partly because the secrecy over authorship gave me the willies.)
I just got back from a visit with my new female doctor. I don't know exactly what I expected but for some reason I feel a little disappointed (hence a lunch that included a McDonald's apple pie - argghhh).
1 cup creamy-style peanut butter
Mrs H3 is knitting too. She started making me a Slytherin scarf for Christmas about three years ago and I’m still waiting for it. She has recently moved home and is currently without television or the computer so I told her she might want to finish the scarf for something to do, a suggestion which she didn’t seem too happy with. She has promised that I’ll have it by my
WOHLSTAND ~ German-Japanese Noise-Compilation:
A bad man and black,
Maybe I am single, maybe I am lonely, maybe I am “differently healthy”. But this is as it should be/is at this moment. Tomorrow I may have a different amount of company and a different level of health, a different appearance, a different age, a different social status – w.r.t. humans and dEvAs. And that is as it should be/is then.
“The first full-length, Multiple Choice, was recorded in the winter of 1980, using Roland Strings, a mini-Korg, some ARP synthesizers and a Boss DR-55, a drum machine that was intensivly used by many minimal synth bands during the 80s and by legendary bands like Sisters of Mercy or New Order in their first songs.
I’m starting counselling this Saturday at Planned Parenthood Toronto (PPT). I’m pretty excited to see how it goes!
Wake up America, Whit was and Bobby is rich, black trash and she died because she was weak. Whether she drowned or her heart exploded, who fucking cares?
Starting with the little black ones. A real nuisance, because they are everywhere, show up in billions and after you got rid of them, there are more showing up.
Each image was colored using Tombow markers and water. I learned some great techniques to make these cards.
This weeks task was St Patrick's Day,
All this is rather new to you quite unheard of ; its not about intellectual understanding or any kind of contemplative phenomena but its purely an
The conception of rock discourse and authenticity owes much to my collaborators in an ongoing project on rock criticism, Ulf Lindberg, Morten Michelsen and Hans Weisethaunet. This group will without doubt develop the discussion much further in its later publications. The presentation of Nordic rock history owes much to information and comments provided by Johan Fornäs and Lisbeth Ihlemann.
There is no rest for the wicked! I now only have 25 days left until my final hand in and I am very swiftly moving onto my next project. An interactive version of Arthur Herzog Jr.’s book ‘The Swarm’. I have already read the book and picked out 10 small horror stories from within the book which I intend to illustrate individually to create my own version of the story as a whole.
- In Rome, 2,000 years ago, Julius Caesar banned chariots from the centre of Rome to ease congestion.
Looks like we have yet another reason to improve upon our watchfulness and security.
Let’s do a post actually connected to the blog’s subtitle. Ethics in deterministic world. I’m getting close to a paradox with this one. But bear with me. It’s not a place to argue about: existance of transcedent values, free will or God. So suppose there are none of these in our universe. It’s a blind end of philosophy, a path of reason that leads to a place not particulary pleasant. Nihilism, determinism, atheism. Three words of horror. I want to pose a question here. What can you do when you found these three snakes creeping in your bedroom (and I’m sorry for such a disgusting metaphore).
So, if the formerly-neutral term is now male-specific, I think it’s time we dust off the formerly-male term and declare it the new neutral. In its older form, this would be ‘vir’, but the direct modern descendant is ‘were’*. Plural weres. Fireweres, fisherweres, congressweres, policeweres, salesweres. Imagine a stereotypical surfer dude thoughtfully addressing a stranger whose gender identity is not clear to him: “Were, that was a sick wave you just rode, were! Weeerrrreee that was awesome. Waves like that separate the weres from the kids, were.” Imagine Aragorn rallying the army in front of the gates to Mordor: “By all that you hold dear on this good earth, I bid you stand, Weres of the West!”
We were stunned. What on Earth was causing our sweet baby to have seizures? We videotaped him having an episode and brought it in for his doctor to see. He immediately knew what was happening to Aidan.
Pope and Lord Archbishop of the Great City of Alexandria and Patriarch of All Africa on the Holy Orthodox and Apostolic Throne of St Mark the Evangelist and Holy Apostle; Father of Fathers; Shepherd of Shepherds; Hierarch of all Hierarchs; Pillar and Defender of the Holy, Catholic, Apostolic Church and of the Orthodox faith; Dean of the Great Catechetical School of Alexadria; Ecumenical Judge of the Holy Apostolic and Catholic Church; Thirteenth among the Apostles.
And Michael was such a smart addition to the story. As Emma and her band of misfits get deeper and deeper into the world of necromancers Michael’s ability to see and intercede in situations that freeze other characters (literally) is an obvious plus. Because Michael only understands logic (and not the gray area most of our reasoning occurs in) he becomes this walking truth indicator for the group. If Michael sees it, believes it, accepts it…it must be true. Helps to bring a lot of the characters into the paranormal loop fast.
- Cornbread
Are you prepared?
Coulda, woulda, shoulda. Procrastination and avoidance. UGH!
Anyway, THANK YOU Nikki and Rob and Lucas and Campbell. Expect a package from me soon!
The dogs didn't think much of it,
Singapore is in the midst of the Inter-Monsoon season with mostly short-duration afternoon thundery showers. Morning thunderstorms are not spared. Rain, thunder and lightning are prevalent during these times. For more information, refer to the Monsoon Update.
Advanced No Limit Theory,
So I don’t need to philosophize. I have a friend who is in accord with my inner voice, and I love it. I can always talk things through with her.
1 render
Need a cheaper alternative? Rouses Market at St. Philip and Decauter is perfect for picnic food and cheap beer to take to Jackson Square.
"Wait..." I chewed on this, weighing the possibilities. Not having time to think, fearing that he would see through my panic and nervousness, I grasped for words. "Wait for..., what's next?"
If you dont prefer the sauce, the wings are good as it is, especially if its a bbq party or so where you dont want to waste time mixing the two together.
Whilst it may not have gained the view counts of Justin Beiber, or people getting hit in the face or kittens, there are people out there who are producing high quality science content. One such individual is Rob Bryanton, whose physics videos have had over 6 million views, with his ‘Imagining the 10th Dimension‘ video receiving particular praise and attention. “The project was born from a personal obsession I have had since I came up with this idea in the early 1980′s. I imagined a way to be able to visualise the extra spatial dimensions. And when I then discovered that with string theory there were ten spatial dimensions, I created this video so I could give people a way to visualise it, that was launched in July 2006 and it immediately took off…” he said. Rob’s videos demonstrate the medium being used as an engaging way of explaining complex scientific ideas.Thank you so much for your support, Ben, and also to Tom Ridgewell, the hugely popular youtuber whose TomSka channel is currently at almost 150 million views. It was Tom who recommended to Ben Good that he take a look at my project. Thanks Tom! Near the end of his article, Ben returns to the discussion of my videos, and offers this:
Great to see Mary-Anne Parker of Saskatoon on the CUC’s Active Democracy Study Group Task Force.
I was looking at products on CSN|Stores and ran across some really cool Valentines products in their Wall Art and Decor section.
Multiple times
Hello and happy Monday everyone~
But back to the socks.
Oh, one thing to mention….you know how a lot of pools have signs to “shower” before entering the pool? And you know how a lot of people tend to ignore those? I am one of those people and today a little bit ‘o karma bit me. One of the strokes I do is to hold this rubber, figure-8 block in between my knees and just swim with my arms. Well, when you lather up your legs with lotion the morning BEFORE you swim in the pool, and you don’t shower before you get in the pool, yesterday morning’s lotion seems to magically appear and it is difficult to keep said figure-8 rubber block in between the knees. It popped out twice while I was summing. In the middle of the lane.
This time it was a back-flip off the bridge.
This is my Nova Scotia clan at a family dinner in February. Back row: Newt, my sister Michelle, Mom, Brad, me, my cousin Julianne, Heather and Emily
The world is made up of much more complex shapes and objects than the cylinder. If we add a top to our shape then the shadow changes as well.
So the Wind Won’t Blow It All Away
Then at another sale I found this brown & white transferware pitcher . I just sold a lot of my brown & white ironstone to a lady , but this was to good to pass up $3.00, so I'll start another collection
Victoria announced on her blog that a sneak peak of The Archived will be in the May 15, 2012, release of The Near Witch paperback edition!
I was trying to decide between a 2-star rating for most of the book and a 4-star for the ending. However, most of the book is obviously, umm, the majority of the novel, so I have gone with 2 stars.
I fear they'll be deserted and left to litter the internet, like the endless strip malls in Florida abandoned when the newer, shinier strip mall across the street opens for business.
Then we went to the dolphin show, where Kathrynn decided she wanted to sit up close to the trainers, the area where you get wet. So we sat there, and then didn't really get that wet. In retrospect I see now that she totally expected to get soaked or at least kinda wet, not just get a few drops of water on us.....
The kids ran around, painted and had a grand old time playing in the cardboard city! Such a great party!!
that comprehensive measures to regulate China's rare earth industry, including production caps, export quota cuts and stricter
Maybe they'll have pots of Hyacinths at Meijer to hold me over until spring....
In case anyone reading this doesn't get the reference, "Bud" Melman was a very funny recurring character on Late Night played by actor Calvert De Forest. He later followed Letterman to CBS and made appearances on the show until his death in 2007.
At least that sounds good, right?
Again, here are the details of the event:
Randomly clicking through Ted Talks and came across this one a while back: The Power of Introverts by Susan Cain.
Colin Arthur Bonnett, 39, New York, N.Y.
117 It follows that, since, in the contested decision, the Board of Appeal based its conclusion as to the likelihood of confusion between the design in dispute and the earlier mark on the comparison of that design with a sign other than the earlier mark, it erred in law and the contested decision must be annulled".
Click here to read about the most recent incident related to the killing of South African Europeans. Bear in mind that there are numerous other incidents, that are not covered by the msm!
I have been on the hunt for the perfect banana bread recipe. I’ve had it before. Back when I was living in Washington DC and going to law school, I lived in a house with 2 other women, and during one summer both girls were gone and we had 2 temporary people staying in the house instead. I remember that the girl was very sweet and made this amazing banana bread with blueberries that to this day I have yet to be able to replicate. It was crunchy on the outside and soft and delectable inside. She said it was her mom’s secret recipe. She wouldn’t share. For that I will always harbor some ill will in her direction. Even though I can’t remember her name or what she looked like. But still! Resent her for keeping that recipe from me I shall!
I used quite a few of Coffee Break's stencils on this page; the rain cloud, both of the splatters, the giant x (which you can't really see, but it provided some of the violet texture), the dots and the clock numbers. The giant letters O & Y were done using guilder's paste. It had never occurred to me to use it on chipboard before. I was looking at the letters thinking they needed texture and had a "duh!" moment when I thought of my paste. Here is a close-up of the letters:
43. Abbott & Costello Meet Frankenstein is only the second time Bela Lugosi would play “Dracula” in a feature film. (He played other vampires in the interim, but not Dracula.)
Or begin your run
Each Cross Bottle image can be enlarged by clicking on the photo so that you can look over the details of every bottle. Each and every one of our Vintage Cross Bottles are made by hand in our studio. They are not mass produced, they are not farmed out, they are true pieces of original Art - each one unique. The imperfections, variations, and signs of age are part of what makes them special and part of their unique charm.
While this was happening in our street, some parts of town had no rain at all! There is a low hill between here and the rest of the town which seems to be the dividing line, rain falls on one side of the hill but not the other. On Monday it was obviously our turn, while a couple of days ago the other side of the hill had their turn. In yesterday afternoon's storm quite a bit of hail fell here - I wonder what they had in town? We are only a few kilometres away from the centre of town, but there is that hill.......
Ophelia tried to picture the overweight and slightly balding editor running around wearing a bandanna and twin bullet belts but this image proved a little too incongruous to hold for very long.
Mommy: " No, honey, they are not!!"
“Initially, learning all those different gestures, I didn’t find it a very intuitive environment. As I worked with it more and began to understand how you get from place to place and do different things with the interface, suddenly it was just like a whole new world opening up. Happily, they have a very nice 800 number for help with my iPhone and boy, did I talk to those people! It probably took me about a week to learn the gestures and probably about two months or so to get pretty good with the iPhone. Now, it’s just incredible!”
–no binding to shift/alt/ctrl keys
“Really? What does he want for it?”
Jailed: Mother Tessa Vanvlerah, right, allowed Kenneth Kyle, left, to rape her five-month-old daughter on several different occasions
I’ve had the pleasure of working with him as a drummer and as a guest vocalist on a different album and it’s just really fun to work with him.
The way in which we’re spending—largely without thinking—has fueled the “economy of crap,” as Amy calls it (check out Amy’s thought-provoking post entitled, The Harbingers of Decline). Companies produce more and more stuff that adds no value to our lives and eventually ends up in landfills. The environment is more polluted and ravaged of resources, consumer debt rises, and the only ones who gain are corporations and Wall Street.
Pinch of cardamon
Their wing veins are a good way to identify the specie, it would be like finger prints in human beings.
THE EARL OF HARROWBY asked Her Majesty's Government:What Department has inherited the duties and propaganda of the pre-war Empire Marketing Board and whether modernised publicity, along the invaluable lines on which they worked, can be re-introduced to-day.
I wish I could say that I had big plans for my 29th year, but I actually hope to be lying around in bed for most of the year (quite literally).
“Hi. My name is Shannon Brown and I’ve been kidnapped,” she says in a bit of a panic.
We guarantee that you will not regret.
So where does this leave us? On the premise that I have not a verbatim transcript of Mr Wight’s evidence, and I do not know what the police or Crown Office have by way of evidence, can any conclusions be formed?
A new company is hoping to launch in the near future that will deliver tacos fresh to your home or workplace by drone helicopter! The start-up is planned for the Silicon Valley area where people will be more likely welcome our new robot overlords. The idea is this: You place your order from your smartphone, the computer at Tacocopter logs in your co-ordinates, lunch is loaded on a drone much like the one pictured above, and in no time at all, lunch from above!
7) rhapsodize
“The grandest teaching of Christ was not that you shall have everlasting life—but that you do; not that you shall have brotherhood in God, but that you do; not that you shall have whatever you request, but that you do. All that is required is to know this. For you are the creator of your reality, and life can show up no other way for you than that way in which you think it will. You think it into being. This is the first step in creation. God the Father is thought. Your thought is the parent which gives birth to all things.” CWG Book 1
Waving to the girls
Also like to act as senior public order or firearms commanders and critical incident managers. One of them will be “The DCI”, a senior detective, responsible for all crime investigation locally.
All in all, archaeology is pretty straightforward. You go to the digsites, survey and get the fragments and keystones, complete projects to get skillups, repeat until capped.
So, the data format was modified in late 2009 to this:
They're clearly very proud of themselves, since they also put this striking image on their catalog cover.
It's Joycelyn here, your November hostess, and this week we're doing a challenge that I've done a few times in the past, but it is definitely one of my faves!
He was right. The episode, in which the Simpsons visit Jerusalem, offended me as a Jew and as a believer in Jesus (I am both), and, if I were a Muslim, I'm sure I would have been offended as well.
Really, is there a full moon? Or some planet in retrograde somewhere? Something is seriously screwed up in BeadLand this week, and I'm about to out a copyright-violating Etsy seller, so here we go, SOPA notwithstanding.
Shake ingredients with lots of cracked ice. Strain into an old-fashioned glass. Garnish with a pineapple spear.
Now I LOVE hot & spicy food, so this wasn't a problem for me. I liked it pretty well, although the sauce was a little too thin for my taste. However, the main judge, jury, and often executioner of new recipes has yet to try it, so I'm wondering what he'll think of it.
It could be a crapshoot, certainly, and maybe I'm looking too much into it...but aren't both teams prominently blue and red? And who drinks blue Gatorade? Red at 8:1...similarly great value here.
NASA dreams big science. Come for the cool, stay for the music, take away a sense of wonder to share. It’s six minutes from Earth to forever, and you can see it here!
TJ Demos (University College London)
So, Lisa gets arrested on Prom night, and the whirlwind begins. Her two best friends- Lila and Cassie pretty much fall off the earth afterwards, leaving Amy to pretty much deserted.
Lester’s earned the right to do that by entertaining us with so much love and care and passion for so many years. GO VIRAL, LESTER! GO VIRAL! I’M HERE TO TRY AND HELP THAT, MY MAN!
It must be really tough. Do you think you are just a victim of bad luck and that’s the reason Ms. Perfect hasn’t appeared in your life yet? Or have you decided that maybe Ms. Perfect only exists on movie screens and not out here in the real world? BINGO! You’ve got it. She doesn’t exist anywhere except in your imagination and on movie screens.
Hello lovely ladies of the blogging world
I’ve also seen a funky drop-down menu on the front page of this site. It might be a bit pie in the sky, but if I have time I might give it a go. The next two weeks are critical for my project, and slight panic is starting to evolve into more of a major panic/paralysis situation. Time to shut out the friends, children, colleagues and bury myself in code.
Accessories: Quickie glue pen, gelly roll pens - gold, white & silver star, markers - not quite navy, always artichoke, real red (SU), Prismacolor pencils, mineral spirits, velvet ribbon, velvet flower, crystal snow glitter (Stampendous), Glad Tidings stickers (K&Co), red embossing powder (Inkadinkado).
With a resolution of 14.2 effective megapixels for flawless, low-noise images, both cameras offer the speedy shooting responses that are prized by DSLR users. The α390 adds the extra benefit of Quick AF Live View. This unique system teams the convenience of live image preview on the tilt-angle Clear Photo LCD with speedy, accurate phase-detection autofocus.
Hellllllo Virginia Beach, Virginia
“When I visited Nigeria two years ago as a member of Parliament without ultimate responsibility for the affairs of that country, I was given an entry permit valid for 14 days and renewable subject to good behaviour.”
I used antique glassware, metal bins and wire baskets to organize the small objects. With all the necessary accoutrements within sight and reach, we had both plenty of workspace and a stylishly organized solution. We even applied magnetic and chalkboard paint to the facing wall to keep shopping lists and important dates handy. It’s also a place to hang special artwork.
Anyway-again, what I think is useful for these sorts of things is a POLL (over in the right-hand margin). But I also like the comments section, because I like hearing people say the DETAILS of they do: "Well, for someone we don't know, I spend $x; but for close friends' kids, I spend more like $2x" or "I let my child choose a gift, and anything up to $20 is fine" or "We've been spending $30, but that was when we hardly went to any parties; now that the kids are getting invited to more, we have to cut it back to more like $15" or "I don't have a plan: sometimes I spend $5, sometimes I spend $40" or "It depends on the location of the party: if it's a home party I aim for $10, but if it's a big exciting place I aim for more like $25" or "Well, we MAKE gifts, so it's harder to figure out, but probably $5 for the materials, and the result is the equivalent of a $15 gift."
Now you could hardly call Swanee River a blues song – in one of its earliest editions, the score was sold as “An Ethiopian Melody” – but it’s a lot closer than the French lullabys and comical Polish dances that made up the rest of that hellish book.
Meal 9 – English muffin Hamburger Pizzas
Scenario was incursion, one I love and know how to play. Left flag went away, and my Reavers were controlling the right one but he did good on dealing with them. I feated simply to kill one of his contesting infantry guys with a Demo Corp and running the other two, plus the few remaining Reavers up the field and sit there with super tough and no knockdown. The Kodiak advanced and killed a couple of infantry guys as well. He pushed forward as much as he could. He tried, honestly, but the very few super tough rolls I made (I made VERY few during the whole tourney) were the ones that counted. He finished his turn feating, making his infantry immortal, with one of them contesting a flag. I already had 1 point from last turn.
And afterward receive me to glory. Whom have I in heaven but You?
Roundly ignored upon release (the album was un-issued in the U.S.), the failure of “Gypsy Blood” signaled the coming musical backslide—Spandau Ballet were just around the corner—that the English record buying public willingly accepted. 30 years later, it still stands alone, reflective of a time when music took chances and changed lives.
I don't know the answer to this question. I only know that Patrick Ness can be very proud of what he has done. Even though injury prevented his running in today's marathon, to raise money for Breast Cancer.
Listening, watching, Tarn began his lessons.The line, "We have already begun," is simple but wise, in just the way McDermott attempted and failed with "hill upon a hill upon a hill." The bit where "the sky dreamed blue" is a better turn of phrase than I found anywhere in 25 pages from McDermott.
I don't go to many yard sales. I liked to go when the kids were young and gas wasn't so high. I enjoyed looking for bargain clothing for them when they were little - and not so picky about what they wore and got dirty outdoors. However, there was an ad in our local paper that caught my eye this weekend, in the midst of all the goodies listed were the words "stamping up" . Hmmmmmmmmmmmmmm....... I decided the weather was great so it might be worth a drive early the next morning. I had a few errands I could do while out anyway.
Hey, a Ziggy Shortcrust post with no drawings or elves. How bonkers is that?!
and blew out the candle
It's no secret ad agencies like bright, shiny objects. Especially when they happen to arrive in the form of advertising awards.
1 impressions
One of the things that struck me was how little things have changed over time in terms of what women carry with them. I laughed out loud when I found something that most women have in their purses...
“Where’s Kenny? I came here to talk to Kenny.”
· Relieves pain
Throughout the day we got to spend time with just the four of us. We hung out in one of the rooms that didn't have any children in it. We hung out outside with just us. We rocked our boys, and fed them bottles, and snuggled them. We whispered promises to be back as soon as we could be back. We cried at random moments throughout the day, knowing it would soon be ending.
As a result, the Savings Bank employed a selection of people that was, in many ways, more 'inclusive' and 'diverse' than many modern workplaces. That's putting it politely. All human life was there, from battle-scarred war veterans to people who would now be diagnosed as autistic. The one thing they all had in common was an aptitude for numbers.
Ultimately, it’s been quite a productive week.
Labels are limiting and lugubrious. We label people as a way to contain them, as well as to create a consistent, pre-determined expectation. This is tremendously unfair…
Ridley Scott presents us with a smart film, cleverly making use of the gangster genre by examining it from a modern angle. The character of Frank is informed by the gangsters before him, but updated by modern business methods. If the product had been a legal one, this could have been simply a movie about a daring entrepreneur and his rise to wealth. But, Scott reminds us, this is a product that kills people and gets them killing each other. Filmed primarily in bright daylight colors, we see that this isn't a noirish gangster, but a figure who knows how to grab power in broad daylight and get away with it, just as easily as shooting Tango in the head. The film is packed with major talent; Chiwetel Ejiofor's hopelessly impressionable Huey, RZA's classic junkie impersonation, Idris Elba's ruthlessly clueless Tango, Armand Assante's Renaissance man mob boss, Josh Brolin's so crooked he doesn't even think about it, Trupo, and Clarence Williams III's convincing older patriarch Bumpy Johnson. That being said, the movie clearly belongs to Denzel Washington and Russell Crowe, both leaving no room for doubt that they are the center of everything.
For the first time (or should that be the 'furst' time?) here on The Bottled Beer Year, I have just reviewed two beers back-to-back which share an overwhelming array of similar qualities.
BTW I stuck the photo up big, here, so you can see that girl-smile. It doesn’t quite come across when posted in moderation, the way sensible blog-owners do.
I think I know exactly what I did to deserve this. I beat not one, but two tickets in traffic court. Shocking, I know. The first time I was accused of running a stop sign, which I did not run. I was there long enough to yell at all the kids “You better have your seat-belts on right, there’s a cop over there!” The judge agreed yelling that while already stopped and waiting to make sure everyone was in compliance was long enough to constitute a full stop. Then last year, I was stopped for going 55 in a 45. I let the officer know the speed limit was 55. He made note of exactly where he clocked me on the ticket. So, I took a picture of the speed limit sign and noted its exact location. “Oh yes,” said the DA, “the speed limit does go up right when you pass Bandas (Mexican Food Restaurant).” Case dismissed.
The Page of the Duke of Savoy (Catherine Blum, 1853-4)
Hope you are all well!!!! Starting to get super excited about BOOBs even though it's a ways off!!
- a red minnow basket that I got last year at an antiques store that was closing
4:11: I didn’t realize that there was a difference between you-stress and distress.
And finally, there’s the story of the Australian boy who just had enough and became a hero to many by slamming his bully to the ground. Just as we saw with the death of Osama Bin Laden, as people took to the street to celebrate, many celebrated this boy fighting back and “winning”. But what is the price of violence against violence? How can we celebrate the pain or death of another? When someone who is a bully is beaten there is a vindication felt and a sense that the senselessness of the violence and hurt is finally over. Is it human nature to celebrate this violence or is it a continuation of our need to have violence in our lives. Certainly one side of me wants to celebrate and cheer as loud as everyone else and then another side regrets that we have to have violence to end a violent person. This was a big debate this year and will continue to be one. Continue to write in your thoughts and opinions. The debate is a good thing and we should work together to discuss better ways to end bullying.
That, however, is NOT a reason not to ensure that your course (or facility in the case of a track) is ready for record ratification. If you are consistently inviting and having the best athletes in the world compete at your facility, one must assume that on any given day a record could be coming. Because, after all, records are the best performances ever, and typically they come when the best are competing against each other, and they typically come when least expected. After all Robert Cheruiyot did set a course record of 2:05:52 when he won last year – indicating that fast times could be run!
10. Back Door Man
On 31 January 1985 the State President of South Africa, P W Botha, speaking in parliament, offered Mandela his freedom on condition that he 'unconditionally rejected violence as a political weapon'. Mandela refused! It was the sixth such offer - earlier ones, as far back as 1973, offering to remit his life sentence on condition that he recognised the Transkei authorities and agreed to settle their as a Transkei citizen. Mandela by Martin Meredith (Mar 30, 2010) ISBN: 9781586488321
Too much going on in real life (nothing bad, not at all, just busybusyBUSY), and I am neglecting this.
Every week,
Location: Crown Heights, Brooklyn, 3/4 trains to Kingston or Utica Avenues.
I give it thanks, nearly twenty years later, for my renewed acquantance with Screamadelica. I saw sense eventually, and my now-deceased Pioneer turntable played the red vinyl 180 gramme reissue beautifully.
this week seemed to drag on a lot longer than most since my man was in colorado for work. say it with me, “boooooo!”
Method Four – Market Salaries
Shery created WriteSparks! – a software that generates over 10 *million* Story Sparkers for Writers. Download WriteSparks! Lite for free - http://writesparks.com
Ooh see that girl, watch that scene
In 2005 you were selected for the Scottish Book Trust Words@Work mentoring scheme and developed your writing with Kathryn Ross of Fraser Ross Associates. Then in 2006 you were awarded a Scottish Arts Council New Writers Bursary. Could you tell us about these schemes and how they helped you with your writing? Is there any advice you could offer writers interested in applying for these schemes?
On this Sunday in particular, the family and I went to an animal rescue center. In addition to an ark’s worth of animals that we saw (and honestly, one day, I will post a plethora of pictures from that visit), there was one particular monkey that stole the show for us.
For Jan 16, I went straight for the first one on the list: 2-N-5, a tangle created by CZT Anita Roby-Avery. Anita's instructions begin with a pencil grid, but I like to freeform on this stuff, so that's what I did. I like when things are a little wonky, so this works for me. I show my steps to the tangleation below. Once I had the basic tangle done, I did a few more things to it. I had so much fun I did another one going a different direction on Jan 17. I extended the lines from the 17th into the 18th, and began a few elements of Pais by Mikee Huber, then added some Hollibaugh by Molly Hollibaugh, and finished adding the insides of Pais after the Hollibaugh. If all this sounds confusing, just refer to the steps below. I had so much fun with these, that I had to share the steps. (You can find the original steps to these tangles by clicking the links provided in this post.)
I love the look of big cats. They have so many mannerisms of our domesticated cats. Ever see your cat decide to lay down? They usually stand there and then fall over. I have seen lions do the same thing on nature programs.
"I've a feeling I'm going to know that regulation off by heart." I grumble to myself.
